I get on here and talk about what all I've done this summer. All the trips and things I've gone to.
Canon 60D, Sigma 50-500 mm f/4-6.3
Whilst I prefer to stick with Camomile, I thought it would be interesting to find out the legal status of cannabis in Spain. Go to:
Her efforts, which have brought her international recognition –and kudos from the U.S. White House to Canada – have uncovered a network of human sex slave traffickers that reached as far away as Spain. A foundation Trimarco created in her daughter’s name has helped to rescue 150 victims of human trafficking around the world.
"You poor thing. Well, check him out, just Wed....nes...day." I didn't hear the first part of what she said because another car had pulled up behind me so I drove off with a jovial wave of my hand...
I am beginning to feel lost in my current life choices. I strongly hate physics with a passion and find absolutely no interest in it at all which is discouraging me from continuing with my educational path.
All in all, I feel loved and happy, despite having almost lost my car, being totally broke, and completely afraid of the future. Not too shabby.
My dream life has been complex and ornate recently. I try to capture the fragments that don't make it off the dream stage to the unconscious backstage area in time when I open my eyes in the morning...those stills from the film that I then try to lay out in front of me in the hopes that they will trigger more complete memories. Offer a chronology or a hindsight storyboard. The emotions I have in my dreams have been more vivid than my waking emotions. It's exhausting to sleep. The dreams have been a little like LOST. There's lots of information and I can't assimilate it. Are these clues to something bigger or just random scenes?
In the current issue of a German men’s magazine for the preservation of the dominant western culture, Bahamas, next to an item in which Uli Krug defends Pope Ratzinger from nasty criticism, be found some scribblings by Sören Pünjer under the title “The spirit of Winston Churchill: in Great Britain provides the English League for the Defense of excitement and confusion (which is not linked here, please find it yourself). During this tirade, the author honestly tries to honesty present the EDL as an anti-fascist and patriotic opposition to a dark, Muslim-directed conspiracy (the abolition of English Christmas and the St. George’s Day and the introduction of Sharia law in Britain).
As to whether NewzBin had communicated the claimants' films to the public, Kitchin J found guidance in a European Court of Justice ruling in rather a different context, Case C-306/05 Sociedad General de Autores v Editores de España (SGAE) v Rafael Hoteles SA. In that preliminary ruling on a reference from Spain, the Court had said:
In the case of this fantastic little project, you have Enchant's leading man Ted Leonard gliding amidst the furious finesse of Arch Rival guitarist Michael Harris, who masterminded the whole shebang. And if there's one thing I know about guitarists, its that they tend to write pretty good songs: 'Sacred Treasure' is a vintage stab at Dream Theater circa 1992, complete with synth-guitar counterpoint and some Flamenco sweeps. Some cuts are downright infectious as far as pop-metal sensibility goes though, with kudos to the Eastern scaled 'A Legend`s Avalon' and 'God Of Oblique', a song that Ray Alder would have sacrificed babies for to have written himself.
will survive this. I will start again,” he sings in Icelandic over a rhythm that sounds
9. Grapes
Him. I see him and he is mildly excited but there is no heart in his acts. His body moves to some rhythm, a pulse quickened by blood, some inner demon making him twist and writhe. I can feel his clammy skin under the fashionable clothes, his stale breath falling on her neck.
The Old Eagle Tavern is doing an event with Massachusetts's Clown Shoes Brewery on March 29th that you need to get to work on right now. Clown Shoes is known for their Tramp Stamp "Belgian" IPA, and Old Eagle is having a 'tramp stamp competition.' Design your own tramp stamp tattoo (or ass antlers, if you prefer, and let me tell you, this post is taking me places I never thought the blog would go...) design and get them in by March 25th: email digitals to info@oldeagletavern.com , or drop them off at the Tavern (on 8.5X11 (or smaller) paper, not folded, and "must be camera ready"). Remember to include your name, email, and phone. Phone number, that is; no bribing with electronics. The "stamps" should incorporate beer, or Clown Shoes, or the Old Eagle, or something like that, eh?
I was in the Sheffield Tap a few weeks ago, nursing a half of Thornbridge St Petersburg at the bar. In came two middle-aged guys with – and I swear I’m not making this up – plastic carrier bags full of VHS videos of locomotives, which they were swapping with each other. They went to the bar, ordered a couple of beers, and said, loudly enough for all the pub to hear, “We should get a discount in here!”
Woo Jin then interrupts to tell Dae Su about post hypnotic suggestion. He explains that he hypnotized both him and Mi-Do, as both were highly susceptible to hypnosis. His first hypnotic suggestion was to go to Mi-Do's restaurant. The second was a response to the cell phone ring, causing him to say "Who are you?" Mi-Do was conditioned to react to that phrase, grabbing his hand, which in turn caused him to pass out. All of these events were designed to make the two fall in love.
You are ready to let me go now. I love you”
”I don´t suppose you´d consider giving it back?” The Cardinal said. No pretenses.
Then, leave somewhere to dry for a few hours (I think you're supposed to leave it for 24 hours? I did for some, but not all)
-Ask me about international shipping fee from Japan( it should be about 1500yen~4000yen)
Although the SPC is a creation of EU law and its inclusion in the Court Agreement has some logic, it still looks a bit strange to have a national property right bundled up in the supranational Unified Patent Court Agreement. On the other hand, maybe it does make sense since standard European patents (which are in effect national property rights too, after grant and validation) will fall under the Court’s jurisdiction.
Contact Name:
I didn't want to disappear without saying howdy, and also to let you know that I am typing this post on probably one of the most ancient laptops that still works. It's my dad's, and we actually have to preheat it, like a toaster oven, for about 10 minutes before we can use it. My mom says, "Sid, go preheat the computer so Julie can send an email to her friends!"
It is the traveler’s map, the pilgrim’s
I helped out on a school trip this week, taking two classes of Year 1 children (aged 5-6) to an art gallery. The theme was portraits, particularly focusing on feelings; the feelings portrayed in the art, and the feelings we have in response.
On one of the nest, I could only see two birds and they were facing away from me. The other one on the near side of the river was filled with four young chicks and the mother who had just flown in to feed them. I got one shot of them, then a couple of minutes later I captured an isolated shot of the mother, to make a portrait of sorts. By the way, there are no discernable features between the male and the female Great Blue Heron.
“I think it was a professional hit on the mom,” Little Soldier said. “It was a slow death.”
LOVE!!! I chose a cognac color, yet another great neutral. I love the design and can see myself rocking them with tons of looks. The Vince Camuto Baron sandal also comes in black but I typically don't wear black shoes in Spring or Summer.
Grazier Photography
I love visiting beautiful blogs and sharing inspiring photographs of cottage home decor that I find while stumbling across the internet, but when blogging friends ask to see more pics of our tiny house, I panic.
Earlier during the PKR youth congress on Nov 25, the youth wing deputy chief Khairul Anwar Ahmad Zainuddin in his winding up speech said Bersih 3.0 is tentatively scheduled for next February.
It's almost time to cut the cheese! OK, so maybe you think fart jokes are a little immature. That's your opinion, and I can appreciate your high-brow intellect and elitist sense of humor. I really do. But let's ask someone who had a reputation for intellectual humor, Kurt Vonnegut, about the fart joke milieu. In his novel "Galapagos", the only humans to survive a global disease lived on a remote island. Everyone else was rendered infertile by the disease, leading to the near extinction of our species. However, living on a remote island for millions of years, the survivors naturally continued to evolve in ways we would not have evolved otherwise. We become more like a furry version of a seal, with virtually no resemblance to the humans of present day. In fact, one of the only remnants of humanity as we know it today is that everybody still laughs when someone farts. So there you go you elitist, high-brow intellectuals. Kurt Vonnegut made a fart joke. In your face. He didn't make the fart joke actually in your face. That's just a figure of speech. And he's dead, so presumably not farting in anyone's direction at all. Unless of course there is 1.) Heaven, 2.) He is there, 3.) People still fart in heaven. I am going to let you ponder that one on your own.
Having never seen a professional soccer game, much less a game at the World Cup, I was riveted by Doyle's descriptions of what happens before the game begins (the little outdoor park parties where fans are entertained by local bands) and all the mayhem and celebration during the game. He even will describe what goes between the teams....most of which the TV cameras do not catch. Don't get me wrong, TV has some great coverage, but it doesn't quite capture the energy and atmosphere of a live crowd! This is how he describes the end of Turkey-Korea match:
1) a series of photographs of the mill in olden times (the leftmost photo is from the 1890s, I think) …
On a side note (having nothing to do with anything) I think it’s important to note that all of his fellow employees basically stood around and watched as these two unruly customers came across the counter, hell-bent on killing the poor cashier. It was only after he found a weapon and was effectively defending himself, that his fellow workers attempted to stop the insanity.
hit to my heart was the lack of respect, the failure to acknowledge what I
In our twenties our lives separated as we followed different paths for her marriage and children and for me a career which meant much moving around and we just lost touch.
Joe: Speaking of hot places, how will the dog tolerate temperature extremes? Many short haired varieties really suffer in cold weather. What reaction will they have to going into strange places? We once had a dog that refused to go potty anywhere but her own back yard. One time she held back for a week before we finally broke down and returned home. I thought her eyes would never uncross. Do they train easily? Golden Retrievers can't please you fast enough. Dachshunds believe that it is you who needs training. (We've had both.)
My love, what can I do to make the whole world love you? Make use once again of this wretched instrument to renew the faith and conversion of sinners.
that the worlds a stage
I like my arms the way they are ie not covered in scratches.
On the other hand…. you will be better served, if you plan a career at the Bar, by reading two excellent blogs…
Human Nature
So, the Karazhan run (again, 70 and up Horde) will be around 7pm EST and upon conclusion of that I’ll be taking a short break as it will be my son’s bed time. I’m going to politely ask Effy to look after getting the ball rolling on the ICC run, which will ideally start around 8:30pm EST.
My first couple sips left the initial impression that the wine was fruity, good, but not all that remarkable. However, with the third sip, things began to improve dramatically. I had a pretty good sized glass, and I have to report that sips #3 through #10 were downright awesome. Starting with that third sip, this wine got VERY drinkable.
Heidi is totally paleo now, so I’m certain she no longer makes this. I’m not, so if you want to taste a little friendship whip this little gem up for a breakfast or brunch.
 Mr Grundlingh urged anyone who witnessed the assault to contact the police station
Being a pretty busy family, one of the things we have done to make things easier when on the go, is whip up a basket of pre-portioned snacks each week. We have been doing this for quite awhile now, in fact, I originally shared the process here.
- Matthew 6:34
The elevation here makes for defensibility against attack, in this case supplemented by the deep ditch, Town Dyke, that I cross as I head southwestwards downhill onto Pewis Marsh. The town walls extended to this point too, although were possibly just a wooden palisade here, but the only evidence of these fortifications is New Gate. A stone arch flanked by two towers like Strand Gate, it differed in that it lacked a portcullis and could only be secured by two heavy wooden gates. It sits in open countryside, surrounded by trees, evidence of how the town has shrunk, looking banished, quite forlorn and almost ashamed, as it was through New Gate that French and Castillian attackers entered the town in 1380 after the wooden gates were opened by treacherous townsfolk.
Live Action Drama
In 2010 we had 55 people take part, many of whom have become great blogging friends. We saw our followers skyrocket and the comments on our posts increase, and had fun taking part in the Challenges as well (kartofflepuffer anyone???).
Either way, though, time is running out. The FT blog has documents which "make clear the schedule is slipping dangerously". The Wednesday meeting of eurozone finance ministers, that was cancelled, was supposed to approve the launch of the restructuring so the process can begin today. Instead, we have the three-header with Monti in the chair.
The hotel is known to be inhabited by seventeen different spirits but there are three specific ghosts that frequently make themselves known to guests and employees. One is the smoking man who leaves behind a lingering cigar scent after he appears, the second is a small boy and the third is a lady of the night by the name of Julia Lowell, who killed herself at the hotel after being rejected by a hotel regular.
As the three of us were chatting and walking around the beautiful remains of Qutb Minar, a well-dressed, Indian businessman came up to us with a group of about ten other people.
Subtract a quarter inch at each seam for each piece of fabric. There are four seams and two pieces of fabric losing a quarter inch at each seam.
Mix dry ingredients. Cut in butter until crumbly. Beat egg with fork. Add milk and egg to mixture. Stir in raisins. Roll out 1/4 inch thick onto floured surface. Cut into 2.5" rounds with cookie cutter or glass. Fry in frying pan over medium heat. Brown on both sides. Pan should allow drops of water to sizzle but not bounce around on pan. Remove to cooling rack.
Less talkative but amiable. I can blab away with the best of them at times, but I also like to listen. Not sit impatiently waiting for my turn to talk next, but really listen to people. I have an insatiable appetite for insight into why people do things, and listening really feeds that.
Not in any crass way.
*These images are from all over the place, and they don't belong to me.*
With this last Golden Demon in Italy, the GD season of 2011 has come to an end. It has been a very good year regarding level and number of participants in practically every country. I would like to do a little summary of the Slayerswords we have seen this year, let's see:
By Alyssa Figueroa
Cuba in the late 1950s. Natch. Do you see a recurrent theme here?
Anyhow … I cut some limbs today and my goats were just across the fence. A captivated audience. So I had an idea. I thought that I might toss the limbs into the goat lot and let them snack a bit. When they’re done, I’ll just drag them to the burn pile in the back of the lot.
fiending.
For Journaling….
Before the change, it read as ‘Defend the Innocent‘, but I think it is much better worded in this new way. I think I’ll be able to fulfill this Protocol now, simply because ‘the Innocent‘ required me to be a bit too subjective. This way, it seems more like I’ll be taking an over-all objective view.
“The steep downgrade is premised on the heightened likelihood of default on the group’s CP/MTN following a series of unfavourable developments announced on Feb 29,” it said.
At or around the mid-80′s, education began to change in ways which no one could have forseen and for good, bad or inbetween, we now live in this new education dilemma. Women, who were mainly the K-12 teachers historically, began to realize they could work outside the classroom, even in academia. Teachers began to leave the classroom for other higher paying positions, particularly those who were the creative types and had a background in math, science or the ability to sell something. New teachers began to be trained at an alarming rate and quality control began to, in some regards dissipate and in other areas quality improved. There was stasis no more within the system and this began a change in the profile of what a good education seemed to be – a change that we are now reaping in the 21st Century.
In other news, life in the cornfields is great. Brady is exploring industry requirements for computer programming and game creation so he knows what secondary education route to pursue. He's working at Subway, taking Community College classes, and teaching programming to homeschoolers.
If you are interested in making your own, The Little Blue House is going to offer a weekly class to create two tags each session - starting after Christmas. We will also be offering kits. Watch for more information soon.
Then I received an email from someone which I NEVER saw coming – could have knocked me over with a feather. Took this gal out of my mental trash can.
McLean
Tam o'Shanter is the first expression created by Cutty Sark master blender Kirsteen Campbell and is a development of the Cutty Sark 25yo.
Goddesses & Angels;
My dog killed:
But we can both learn — both me and this energy. Some have said the energy is flat here, but to me, its potential is remarkable, for it has been unused for millennia, maybe since the beginning of time.
To turn into something
You are right here in Austin, Texas, only the year is 1911 and drinking water is untreated. It wasn’t until 1915 when the State’s first sanitary engineer Vic Ehlers was appointed by the governor to make inspections, investigations, and reports of water borne disease epidemics, and the City of Austin was convinced to chlorinate their water in 1916. Typhoid from public water sources in Texas was eradicated as Mr. Ehlers traveled from town to town, educating water operators and engineers.
Am I absolutely forbidden from partaking in these things? No. I have my agency. And if I did nobody would know, right? Of course not – I would know and I’ve made the decision to live by this standard as a promise to myself, my family and my Father in Heaven. I find it incredibly interesting that a document written so many years before the discovery of the dangers of alcohol and the creation of the food pyramid could be filled with so much truth about the proper way to eat and be healthy.
PS: I had to include a picture of my parents' dog, just because his name is Tango....
Today's competition is over. I've been home for about an hour now, after a long and busy day. I don't really have the energy to do any serious selecting of images at the moment so I've resorted to showing a couple which I found during a very quick search, which pleased me for varying reasons.
repetition. It was a big influence on me too. It's a shame
Spoon into pan. Bake 1 hour or until toothpick comes out clean. Cool in pan on wire rack 10 minutes. Remove from pan.
-10 points if you use a word that has the combination twice. (i.e. aardvark.)
Annoyed that for some reason photobucket has drained some of the colour out of these shots....
"Shoot me if I'm not already dead!"
The latter is in essence ... beaded paisleys ... and I've cranked out 10 so far ... and they are pretty cool!
An internet directory or search engine (such as this) is NOT a publisher at common law, just a facilitator.
Sadie was relieved to get up off the clock
Wednesday - Leftovers
A Square wave
God wants what is best for us...and while certain behaviors might not technically be labeled a sin, it also doesn't mean it is what is best for us...and by extension, what is best for our children.
PLUS a snippet about your product and a link to your website.
What are your thoughts on “nanny break times?” leave your comments below:)
Check his credentials. Then read his letter to Pelosi!
and so she's fully potty-trained.
In his new novel Wonder Struck, Mr. Selznick continues the experiment with words and pictures he began in The Invention of Hugo Cabret. The story-line in Wonder Struck is similar but simpler than Hugo Cabret was. The are children on the run, this time a deaf girl and a boy looking for his father. There is a marvelous old building to hide in, this time the Museum of Natural History in New York City. There is a connection with the past that brings about the novel's resolution. The deaf girl's story is told through pictures intermingled with the boy's story which is told in text. She moves forward in time while his story looks back to the past. Their paths cross at the the Museum of Natural History where their connection is revealed.
1) The movie theater is not your living room couch. Anything you say during the movie can be heard by others and we really don’t care about where you want to go eat after the flick.
The video is very creative but I had mixed feelings as I was watching her sing about all of the things that she worked on while she worked at Microsoft.
In October 2009, we announced that Gatwick had been bought by GIP, for £1.51 billion.
We unloaded at the Athlete's Village in Hopkinton, which is the whole campus of the town's junior high and high school, with an unreal number of port-o-johns (isn't that so East coast?) lining the perimeter, some really large tents, and an announcer playing music, telling jokes, and directing race traffic next to the jumbo screen.
The supplier of feed and fuel takes the 100 Euro note and runs to pay his debt to the town's prostitute that in these hard times, gave her "services" on credit.
Over the next couple of months you will notice that IHeart Organizing is getting a facelift!!!
as the actor as the director
Spike Lee your films speak to me. But now I wanna speak back I would like some updates and look forward to your feedback.
10. Business reputation: RB - ‘ Detached from values, money may indeed be the root of all evil, but linked effectively to social purpose; it can be the root of opportunity.
Maybe she's a mother-in-law who is hard to please (no offense to mothers-in-law!).
It’s very intriguing. At the start of the readalong I was actually reading the quotes but not really giving them a great deal of attention to be honest. I only went back to check them out because there was speculation about who the quotes were from – at that point I hadn’t even considered that they were from one of the characters we were reading about. I think this is a great way of incorporating another storyline. I’ve had to go back to the beginning to reread the quotes and piece together the little story that’s taking shape. What a great idea. We’re not getting to see the Lord Ruler and so far he’s a big mystery which all adds to the speculation about him but now we have this story within the story it’s really very interesting. I wouldn’t say that learning a little more of the Lord Ruler’s story is making me like him anymore but perhaps it starts to give him a bit more of an identity – you can see that he didn’t start this way and maybe living for two thousand years would be enough to make anybody a bit jaded (no, still don’t like him)!. I certainly want to find out what actually took place and I’m interested by these mists/shadows that are mentioned. Perhaps, the Lord Ruler was the first person to be born a mistborn but without direction he didn’t know how to use his powers or perhaps he found this ‘eleventh’ metal that nobody else seems to know of and has used that to become immortal. It feels to me like Sanderson is now taking us down the path of ‘can we really trust Kelsier’? The Lord Ruler didn’t seem to always be the monster he is now known as and so will Kelsier’s inevitable saviour status corrupt him also. I’m not sure that I believe that at the moment. I can see that Kelsier is becoming a little bit enamoured with his new ‘celebrity’ status but he still seems to listen to the rest of his crew. Anyway, I’m eager to find out – I wonder whether the recently discovered book that Sazed is translating will reveal something important or essential about the Lord Ruler??
But.. we started off with an extraordinary song from an extraordinary new CD compilation.
Sierra Nevada Brewing Co. Sierra Nevada Anniversary Ale (2007-2009)
On you and you alone, O Sweet Protector
Sounds like: Dream-pop, which here is the homo sapiens sapiens to shoegaze’s apes – if the apes mated with organs, Fleetwood Mac, Mazzy Star and French singers. Legrand’s voice varies from softly mellifluous on their first two albums to powerfully husky on Teen Dream; it’s frequently been compared to Nico (of Velvet Underground and Nico fame)’s vocals.
They’ve brought flowers. Well chosen.
Cilantro causes the gallbladder to dump bile — containing the excreted neurotoxins — into the small intestine. The bile-release occurs naturally as we are eating and is much enhanced by cilantro. If no chlorella is taken, most neurotoxins are reabsorbed on the way down the small intestine by the abundant nerve endings of the enteric nervous system”
We look forward to a new year and to the many opportunities to create and capture life. Our goal for 2011 is to Celebrate Life. Come join us on this journey as we journal, scrapbook, craft and create a Celebration of Life.
However, the staffing ratios that concerned me will still be low.
“He will go to war up where the lines of longitude and latitude cross (which means towards the North). There, his enemies will burn the great city (this is Moscow set alight by the Russians). He will enter and leave it with his people from underneath the ashes and ruins. His people having no more bread nor water, by great cold, will be in such a bad way that two thirds of his army will perish (this is the retreat from Russia). Then the great man abandoned, betrayed by his friends (the betrayal of Marmont), will be in turn hunted with great loss right to his own city, by the great European populations (the Allies in Paris, in 1814). In his place, will be put the old King of the Cape (this is the return of Louis XVIII, a Capet, like Louis XVI). As for him, he is forced into exile in the sea from whence he came so young, and near his country of birth (this is the Isle of Elbe). He will remain there eleven moons with some of his people, true friends and soldiers.
To enter you must be an Australian resident and only one entry per person will be accepted.
They do a lot of doing.
I went for a run around the planet before sitting down to write this, and I found even fewer people about, and those that were around were focused on quests. I’m not sure if the lack of PvP on planets is due to a population issue, or if it is because the story is so engaging that people rarely think of PvP. It doesn’t seem to be until some of the higher level planets, and in Warzones, that I actually see PvP take place, and then it’s quite an unbalanced dance, at least for me. I may like PvP, but I am not very good at it.
Anchor Brewing Company Anchor Porter
Well... I can. I HAVE.
Maybe this is the fundament of why I go on exploring language and literature. In the written and spoken word I find the signposts that guide me through life’s maze. Language is my oxygen.
In principle, every American citizen has an equal say in our political process. In practice, of course, some of us are more equal than others. Billionaires can field armies of lobbyists; they can finance think tanks that put the desired spin on policy issues; they can funnel cash to politicians with sympathetic views (as the Koch brothers did in the case of Mr. Walker). On paper, we’re a one-person-one-vote nation; in reality, we’re more than a bit of an oligarchy, in which a handful of wealthy people dominate.
Carol Duvall demonstrated standing on big stamps years ago, at a time when I was horribly frustrated by poor impressions and ruined card stock. My craft room had a carpeted floor, so I took a 12"-square piece of smooth plywood I'd had cut for an improvised book press, and used that to support the card stock. Worked beautifully, and I've done it ever since.
This session takes place on Friday 4th May (giving me the prefect excuse to use the tired but still irresistible headline above.) You don't have to take part. But if you want to, have a think, and write on Friday 4th about whatever comes to mind when you see the words 'The Beer Moment'.
2. In a large mixing bowl beat brown sugar, butter, vanilla and egg together on medium speed until well combined. On low speed beat in flour, baking soda and salt just until combined, if too thick use a spoon. Mix in chips and walnuts with a spoon.
- And wow, to see Kelsier fight like that at the end...just wow.
I get it.
I am communicating this concern to you. As to why this concern is necessary, however, we differ fundamentally. That is the result of different life experiences. That makes it so much more important that the two sides listen to each other.
He’s tired like me, but he has an
Racked: 08-30-2007
This 43.5 mile tour will follow along the salt water marshes, beaches, historic districts and most likely a few cranberry bogs in three beautiful South Shore towns.
The photo to the right is the ceiling of the first floor. The building had just finished demolition and was very early in the construction process. So most of the ceilings looked like this and similar to the other jobsite it was pretty bare on the inside.
He said: “Ideas are huge commodities; they rule the world. Capitalism, communism, democracy are all ideas. Money itself is an idea.”
H2Ooo Social recommendations:
*My mother would recommend that you use Asian style noodles that come in a box at the Asian grocery store. I used whole wheat spaghetti pasta for the photos. It doesn't really matter what kind you use, but you'll be less Taiwanese if you don't follow my mother's advice.
Apalachi (2nd), Vic Venturi (UR 20th); 2011 In Compliance 13th; Vic Venturi (BD 2nd)
Lying naked together
Two other changes of interest to retirement plan wonks are the increase in the Social Security Taxable Wage Base from $106,800 to $110,100 (used in plans with an allocation using “permitted disparity”) and the increase from $110,000 to $115,000 for the definition of Highly Compensated Employee (HCE). Note that this definition turns on what was paid in the prior year, so an individual who earned more than $110,000 in 2011 will be deemed an HCE in 2012, whereas an employee earning more than $115,000 this year will be deemed an HCE in 2013.
On Sunday we will be shooting Cowboy Fast Draw at the Sage Hills Gun Club Range in Reno. 7370 Desert Way, Reno, NV. Sage Hill Clay Sports is located on the southeastern flank of the Washoe County basin, overlooking the city of Reno and its southernmost suburbs.
Baby, baby, so beautiful.
Or… My Experience With (and Thoughts on) Competitor Group
I Remember Being Small Mane (Shetland pony?)
For some reason I feel really sleepy and tired throughout the day, even though I have been sleeping properly. Yesterday morning I fell asleep three times while having my breakfast (as in, I suddenly started awake with half-chewed food in my mouth!) I slept as much as I could today and it made some difference...Maybe I'll perk up completely after I have my coffee.
Saman Mohammadi
4. Lastly, call me old-fashioned and politically incorrect, but appearence will always be a huge part of my fitness goals. I want to look good in a bathing suit. So sue me. But anytime I'm honest about how I am a vain individual who values personal appearance, someone hates it. While I appreciate that most of you have encouraged me to write the blog how I want, the drama just isn't worth it to me.
December 18 Burlington, VT Higher Ground
The Woman's Club of Redondo Beach has been meeting for over 100 years and for 88 years they have been meeting in the original clubhouse that was built for them. The Woman's Club "helps in the civic and cultural life of their community."
September 10th I went back to Firestone with my g/f Kathy and my two mechanics showed up to help pack too. The 10th was also my wedding anniversary, which I had thought about but had not let it get to me as I had so many bigger problems to deal with. We had Andy there from 8:30am to 1:30pm and then we were more or less done. I was amazed at how quickly we got it all done. There was still all of the shop equipment, tools, hoists, etc. left but Firestone told me I’d be able to hold an auction to sell that at a later date.
I’ve never read a YA romance like Going Too Far before. Where did you get the inspiration for such an intense story? Did you get ideas for the book from real life situations you’ve been in or people you’ve met?
Quino-a Nutty Grain, it is delicious, like rice.
“Without the shedding of blood there is no forgiveness of sins” (Hebrews 9:22 ESV).
Some members of the group, by way o
It was 1:00pm before I made it into the modular room where my teacher Steve, sponsor Kimmy, and another prayer warrior, Terry, awaited my arrival. Steve and I worked through the 7 Steps to Freedom in Christ (Neil T. Anderson) while Terry and Kimmy prayed for me…for 4 hours.
1 tsp baking powder/”soda”
I have to look down on him, one last time.
Do we have any other way of transportation?
Ichabod spends his long winter evenings listening to the old wives spin yarns of ghosts and goblins and haunted fields and houses. The whole area is said to be haunted; its dominant ghost is an apparition that rides around "on horseback without a head. It is said to be the ghost of a Hessian trooper, whose head had been carried away by a cannon-ball, in some nameless battle during the revolutionary war." Ichabod's walks home afterwards are filled with terror, as he imagines ghosts in the shadowy shrubs and trees everywhere along his path. One autumn evening the Van Tassels host a party, attended by both Ichabod Crane and Brom Bones. It is after the party on his way home that Ichabod has his most terrifying journey ever when he encounters the headless Hessian.
A lot of tiny plants, wild flowers, ferns and moss, are burgeoning on the ground in this season. Still, many people in Japan, including me, are looking forward to see cherry blossoms impatiently.
Mr. Ganser, you are a historian, specializing in modern history and international relations since 1945. You lecture at Basel University and you are the author of numerous works which caused a sensation all over the world. I would like to speak to you about your most well-known book “NATO’s Secret Army”.
Schlenkerla Oak Smoke
Mechner filmed his brother leaping and sliding around a car park to achieve exactly the right type of movement for the Prince’s character. Mechner has also done a fantastic job of archiving his original design journals and personal diaries from the period when he was producing the game. Mechner was kind enough to let us use some of the scans from his notebook within the Games Lounge to show how a designer approaches creating levels, characters and puzzles.
Our appetites were wet for some theatrical rock. I had missed Alice Cooper (he cancelled) the year before, and The Rocky Horror Picture Show was still on the cutting room floor, and we had never heard of Riff-Raff or Time Warps or Meatloaf except for what mom served up on Sunday nights.
I’ve been a loyal Dropbox customer for years and back in January I sprang for the $100 a year expansion of my Dropbox up to 50GB. Everything I use connects to my Dropbox via the Dropbox API and just for the record, I am totally in-love with Dropbox. There is no reason for me to leave them as a customer. But even if you are loyal, it doesn’t mean you can’t explore. I have a professional account with Box.com through my work, and we arranged that after drop.io was consumed by the wraiths at Facebook. I have a personal Box.net account with 50GB but I don’t use it because Box only allows sync with paid accounts, so it’s not worth my while. Google Drive was just along these lines, just another option to look into.
There is always a story, and a hero. A Jesus, a Buddha, a Moses or Muhammad. A Joseph Smith, a Persephone. The stories are miraculous, tragic, silly. It’s what comes later that is interesting—the cantatas, the NGOs, the Haj.
By and large it has the same feel as most of the major cities in the UK with the same shops and coffee chains on every street corner which gives the city a familiar look. The notable architecture speaks of a time when Belfast was the largest ship builder in the world which is no longer the case with the ship yards and sentinel cranes lying dormant.
The day started with going to Irondale with my son's acting workshop - then off to the studio to see how things were going.
(Oh yeah -- that's right. I have toilet papered a priest's office not once, but twice even! I like to live on the edge like that.)
Television’s top newsmagazines, 60 MINUTES and 48 HOURS MYSTERY, will also return in the fall.
Time: Just before dinner.
in California, New York, and any state that accepts one of those through
FOR REVIEW
1/4 large cucumber, cut into cubes
But you say again, “If the pope is as bad as the Turk – and you yourself call him Antichrist, together with his clergy and his followers – then the Turk is as godly as the pope, for he acknowledges the four Gospels and Moses, together with the prophets; must we not, then, fight the pope as well as the Turk, or, perhaps, rather than the Turk?” Answer: I cannot deny that the Turk holds the four Gospels to be divine and true, as well as the prophets, and also speaks very highly of Christ and His mother, but at the same time, he believes that his Mohammed is above Christ and that Christ is not God, as has been said above. We Christians acknowledge the Old Testament as divine Scripture, but now that it is fulfilled and is, as St. Peter says, in Acts 15:10, too hard without God’s grace, it is abolished and no longer binds us.
What also bothers me is that every time I look over at this kid, he is smiling and seemingly waiting for an opportunity to blurt something else out. Some people really need to learn when to stop. This is college, not high school. One would hope if you take anything away from college, it would be maturity. Sure this is an isolated case, but there are many examples of this in other forms. The outcry for attention is never ending.
whether Joe Rogan is reading a script,
folded ribbon
From Marci: This is a repost to help you get motivated in your mornings with the start of a new year upon us. Starting our day strong is important because if the rest of the day doesn't go as planned, you have accomplished much in these first few moments of the day. Most of the items on my list take no longer than 5-10 minutes with the exception of time with the Lord and getting dressed.
At night, you usually wake up once to eat...
I’ve decided to start a new Segment called Filmcraft, where I focus/hone in on some Filmmakers Etc. that I admire…
Now, to a certain extent fiber (like most serious crafts) is its own language, and I’ve found myself able to talk freely to almost anyone who works with it, as long as the conversation is about fiber, spinning, knitting, sheep, and related topics. The one time I’ve brought up religion in the midst of such people I got a rather cold and mildly offensive reaction (I won’t go into detail), so I’ve learned not to do that again. As I said above, I don’t mind dealing with people on the level of fiber and working with it, and leaving it at that; people don’t need to be all things to me in order for me to find some use for them in my life. I also don’t have a probem buying my supplies from such people, or taking lessons from them to enrich my own art. (Hey , I’m Odin’s; we are nothing if not opportunistic.)
To TeamAmity,
Set against the backdrop of Queen Elizabeth I’s succession and the rebellion of the Essex against the queen. It is suggested that Edward De Vere the Earl of Oxford was the penman of the plays of the Shakespeare era, but because of his prominence and laws of the time, couldn’t publish his work. He uses a local theater worker named Johnson to be the face of his work until a young actor named Shakespeare stands up and takes credit, much to Edward De Vere’s disliking.
I think my mom is a little nervous, as I'm sure anyone would be. Who wants to hear the Big C mentioned in regards to their body? My mom, however, is the 4th of her 7 siblings to receive a cancer diagnosis, so you can see why she might be nervous.
Howl-dy, loves, and happy Thanksgiving. I'm stuffed like a little sausage; yourselves?
shattering my morning reveries
Rain makes for stir crazy children. Stir crazy children make for cross-eyed parents. So, we get creative.
I started off deciding like most of you to use up what I already have before buying anything new. I have a load of images already coloured in just waiting to be used.
Finally! We get a beer description!!! YAY!! Oh.. wait! We're lacking a little in the flavor descriptions.... What Hop flavors and aromas does the hop bring to the beer? Are the malt flavors fruity? caramel? Nutty? Roasty, chocolatey, etc? Sweet like Cola or Chocolate? Which one? All in all, not bad description. Doesn't a little green in the bottle basically mean... Bottled too soon or are you trying to say the beer needs to maturate in the bottle?
5. Joint a sociable, sacred or a socio-spiritualanization. Existence ministrant to the society, is a eager belief that will alleviate often of your tenseness.
So was this motivating? What are your tips to getting your laundry done? Do you involve your kids? I'd love to hear your thoughts.
The story: A hacker or whistleblower posted online the global warming email exchanges of one of the world’s leading climate research centers. The emails suggest the global warming scientists colluded and manipulated data to push their global warming agenda.
Of course, it should also be no shock that I absolutely cannot touch a magazine in any office setting. You know what I mean? Those horrid disgusting, finger licked magazines that glaringly stare at you while you are sitting at your doctor's or at your dentist's office. All I can see is a zillion little fingers that have flipped thru those pages. EEEEWWWW! It blows my mind that most doctors offices require you to put a face mask on during flu season so as not to spread germs, but leave out for everyone to touch, sneeze on, cough on, snot on, paper reading products! Like we aren't going to catch anything off those little germ collectors! *shudder*.
Hope everyone had a wonderful Valentines Day!
Unfortunately there are no easy answers.
I recommend this anime if you like comedies with a slightly awkward twist.
You can look back over a year and say “well, I’ve done that thing I set out to do, but I didn’t know it would be this time before I’d be able to say that or that I’d be this person because of it”. But that’s how it can happen.
I sub-
Lately, I have felt like a ping pong ball being blown about out at sea. One minute I'm happy with my renewed love of running and the sense of freedom it brings. The next I'm saddened by the loss of dreams and the reality of separation. These feelings stir an uneasiness in me because the one thing I crave is stability.
- I nurse her in her bed (futon mattress on the floor)
Thanks a million to Carol, Deborah, Isabel, Kathleen, Kristi, Melinda, Missi, Nicci, Polly, and Teka for sharing their ideas.
To make fragrances last, manufacturers often add UV-absorbing chemicals found in sunscreens. When fragrances are exposed to sunlight and air, they can break down. UV-absorbing chemicals are used to prevent them from weakening.
And a couple of you asked about the Inktense blocks... and what they were... they are chunky water soluble ink blocks... and once you add water... they become like translucent ink-like paint...
10 – an independent and fair judiciary.
“While hand-picking is common across the district in any season, selective hand-picking was the only choice for many growers. This increases the costs of maintaining fruit quality, as there is no market for B-grade fruit,” said Chris Carpenter, president of the Canberra District Vigneron’s Association, quoted in a media release.
The two sisters are inseperable, they claim early on in the book that they are almost like one person. I kind of feel they are this way out of necessity in their eyes, they feel like everyone around them hates them because of what their father did. That being said, they like to torture and kill things which obviously makes them not so normal. At the same time that you are horrified by what the girls are doing, you feel sympathy for them. That's not an often result in a book about murderers. Also despite the fact it was mentioned several times I often forgot the ages of the girls, at times I felt they were younger (especially Fancy) and at other times I felt they were older. The boys, Gabe and Ilan, offered a small ray of sunshine into the girls lives that was much needed. Their mother is very much an absentee mother and her choices left me in a bit of shock towards the end.
2) Group project- Napkins for the Prince and Princess, largess basket, wall hangings, etc.
I have picked up the first volume of a 3 volume collection titled: Autobiography of Mark Twain. He had it done before he passed away on the condition that it wasn’t released until he had been dead for a hundred years.
Thursday- African Jungle
Of course, the answer is simply that every stock “trade” has two sides to the bet. One side will lose while the other side will gain. The stock market is nothing more than a legal casino for deceit and usury, designed to make those who promote usury a bucket-load of money. It certainly does not represent the actual value or reputation of a company. When you make a small stock investment, your “broker” or online trading company (for the do-it-yourself-ers out there) do not in any way care whether you win or lose on your particular transaction or trade. They make money regardless of its outcome, via commission on the transaction. Many will convince you (and many others) to buy or sell certain stocks so that the price will go up or down in the market, which will effect the “short” or “long” bets that major funds, corporations, and government institutional funds have made on that stock. A penny in either direction can be worth millions! And of course mutual funds, which control many individual people’s retirement investment capital, will buy and sell investment stock not to help their individual investors and retirees, but to ensure that these future bets are paid by manipulating the price of the stock with huge amounts of pooled fools money.
As mentioned earlier, I am looking at shelving units to nicely display the tanks and jars, as well as provide functionality for lighting and heating (we have a gecko here too.) A camera is in the works so as soon as we are fully settled into the new apartment, I will be posting pictures.
Katherine & Mark – 10
I AM ACCEPTING SUSHI BOWL
6. Vampirella
Elysian Brewing Company Avatar Imperial Jasmine IPA- Brew 2000
While following their back and forth smarty volley it finally got to the point where I was spending so much time looking up weird references and quotes on my iphone that I became overwhelmed with the urge to shoot both participants dead to release the world from their useless blowhard ramblings.
Shall I sit here and watch you mislead me,
As an Unschooler, Devin thinking of life and the purpose of living very differently than most kids his age do today. Devin isn't "preparing for the future", he is living Now! He knows that he only has to do what he loves in life, and the money will flow to him. He has so many passions and interests that he could make money in various ways even at this point in his life. He has always had the freedom and time to do what he wants and live his own agenda, not someone else's idea of what they think he should be doing. In living this freedom, he has mastered skills and talents that only adults have the freedom to pursue in our culture.
Unsure of what to do, I get the bright idea that I maybe, just maybe should open a window. But, I really don’t want to go in there with the crazed bird that for all intents and purposes has diarrhea. So, I stand transfixed for a few moments watching the poor creature fly from perch to perch. And I realize something… I am the only one with the power to free this poor creature. This bird cannot help itself. I have to go in there and DO SOMETHING. And do it quickly before more diarrhea escapes and lands on my beautiful leather sofa.
Our observation is that he has one foot standing on the old testament and the other foot standing on the new testament (and I used to be in that place 2 or 3 years ago), and that’s probably why his posts usually sound confusing due to his belief in a mixture of law and grace (or a mixture of the old covenant god based on illusion of separation and the new covenant Father based on unconditional love and oneness).
Today, the OWS group and Unions are staging a May Day strike. Coincidence? I think not.
Tracks are as follows -
"Hope Realized" is about the countless sacred hopes, wishes, wants, desires and prayers. How many times have I whispered a hope from simple to complex? A question came up in my journal...Do we have a lifetime allotment of wishes and if so is there a catalog, a tracking system? A daunting task by an unseen force? I've thought about my hopes realized and easily believe I have received a generous blessing of answered wishes and prayers. In this piece I used these awkward shaped collographed bottles in a row and added a rather large one below...filled to the brim and tightly sealed. Also noticing the space and time and energy between speaking, thinking, wanting and even forgetting. How the energy returns in beautiful ways...a phone call, a wrong turn, perfect information read, heard or overheard. Ways are found, doors are opened, roads leading directly and indirectly but one thing for sure...I believe hopes are powerful and are heard!
It starts at the top of our estate and runs a long way leaving our village behind and eventually leads onto the next. The road is lined with bushes. At certain periods there are gaps where you can get into the fields. About a third of the way down, a big steep hill drops down and after another hundred metres past that a smaller hill drops down. It had been impassible with the snow earlier in the year. Then, on a corner to the right is a grass verge, a metre wide by a fence. If you climb over this fence you can get down into a tunnel which goes under the road like a subway. Through the tunnel runs the red stream, the beck after which the village was named. Sherburn means ‘clear stream’. But the water is orange because of some kind of clay so not clear at all. The village should really be called Dirtybrownburn. On the left of the tunnel and steam and a little way above is a path leading to a farm. Another farm is on the right. Beyond is the enormous slag heap from the disused pits which looks like a terrifying mountain in the shape of a giant slug. It has many names like ‘Death Hill’ and ‘Danger Mount’. The hill has very steep sides and no grass grows on its grey shingly sides except at the very top. On the top it’s always very windy and thousands of grasshoppers live there, all different colours. You can try, but you can never catch them. Also on the top is an iron air-raid shelter from the Second World War, full of rubbish, rags and a broken vacuum cleaner. We had had a plan once, to clear it out and turn it into some sort of den, a secret base or an attraction like a cinema or ghost tour. We’re warned not to go there by my next door neighbour who tells us about a similar old air-raid shelter. It also had the same sort of roof made of corrugated iron which had collapsed, cutting in half the bodies of all the children playing in it. We don’t go there again after hearing that.
Can’t call it home
I already knew from web reviews that the hostel was renovated in 2006, quiet and well-maintained, and the staff is nice and helpful. But I was still totally impressed by the nice staff anyway, who have been exceedingly helpful with everything, from helping me to buy a sim card and load up on minutes, to offering me a free upgrade to a "bigger room." I was expecting a bigger room (the initial single was rather tiny), but what I actually found myself in was a 2-bedroom suite with three beds! Wow! I totally felt like goldilocks, I tried each bed until I found one that was most comfortable. :) I just can't give enough compliments to the helpfulness, patience, and kindness of the staff here. When my friends called on the first day, the receptionist told them I was probably sleeping and took a message. And since then, they've been careful not to wake me up to clean the rooms, without my asking. And they are always happy to give advice about buses, restaurants, anything you can think of. Plus they are not very busy in the off-season so they are happy to chat with you. On some of the days, I seem to be the only guest at the hostel -- they happily shoo away random passer-bys who want a room to make sure that they only get trustworthy customers. That means a quiet room for me, a whole courtyard in the back by myself, and all the staff's attention. :)
"It proves that there is a God" says the shop assistant.
I had already read a couple of articles about Hunt's UFO movie in Starlog, and its plot, with warring alien races, extraterrestrial abductions, undersea pyramids (in the Bermuda Triangle, no less!), and flying saucer space battles, pushed all the right buttons in my Star Kid brain.
it becomes an uncharted territory of bruise and bone.
Enter my mom’s bathroom, and she has tons of little bottles with varying amounts of perfume. Commercial ones, vintage ones, alternative ones that no one is ever able to find… my mom has them. Although she is not a big fan of the computer as a whole, perfume blogging was a revelation to her. Now she can find out where good-smelling people in Europe buy perfume. She can’t go there, but man, she knows.
I was excited at the idea, but baffled as to how someone in Virginia could tap into the movie- and TV-making machine, much less learn how to write screenplays. However, as I asked around and did some digging, I found out that there was a Virginia Film Office right here in Richmond who’s job it was to support local film industry professionals and encourage studios to come film their projects in the state.
This blog post brought to you by the makers of “Get Off Your Ass and Make Something,” a soul laxative and perfect antidote to your everyday ICK.
Remember kids, “Justice that love gives is a surrender; Justice that law gives is a punishment.”
To Family Circle magazine, all I can say is Bravo!
It all started last year, when I heard about a lady who had started a Lego Social Club. She started it for her son with Aspergers, and it was a wonderful fit for him. A great place for him to make friends and work on his social skills, while having fun.
few thin slices gruyere cheese
Good luck! Contest ends on July 22d at midnight EST. Winner will be announced that weekend. Winner will be chosen through random.org.
If I’ve never met you?
Current City: New York, NY
Alright, not sure how a black and tan is going to work out of the same bottle, but here goes.
In the old days a book had to go through a pretty rigorous gauntlet of acceptance and then endure several rounds of editing, usually emerging better and stronger. Of course some bad books did make it through the system, but not many.
77. Hey, I’m bored. Entertain me and I’ll buy you a root beer.
This morning, two men stood in the same courtroom where they were convicted of aggravated assault and sentenced to life in prison for a rape and shooting that happened almost 30 years ago. This time, both were smiling, as they were one step closer to exiting the criminal justice hell that consumed the last three decades of their lives.
But even though Cherie lights a cigarette at the wrong end and dances around dressed as Stevie Nicks we're still never quite sure what drugs she's doing or what kind of rock star she really wants to be. Joan gets to fill her squirt gun with vodka and later urinate on the macho shithead headliner's guitars; she really IS the wild one, and you hope some wild will off to Cherie's side and for awhile it does. When their plane's about to land in Japan, the pair quickly wolf down their coke and pills in the airplane bathroom to avoid trouble with customs and suddenly the film speeds up for the butterfly stomach sweaty-palmed high of being cranked up onstage, twirling under the hot lights, merging like a playback pitchshift melt with the slow-downs of their first kisses in the dark of post-show euphoria.Their big seduction lesbian moment comes drenched in red light and scored to a slowed, druggy "I Wanna Be Your Dog" that makes you ache in rock and roll remembrance of the first trip on acid; the first trip on ecstasy, the first kiss backstage, or anywhere; first time on stage on acid, the blazing red lights in your face as you sing and flames form a holy funnel around the microphone and your mouth becomes the size of a black hole in outer space, spewing flaming lyrics into the clenched alien insect fangs of the microphone, and outwards in waves of pink that wash over the melting-faced fans. It's a first kiss that starts as a gentle shotgun from a joint and slowly tentatively becomes a supernova of blinding white light. From their first gig to Cherie passing out in Japan, the film is alive with pleasure.
A few seconds after some conversation, I felt someone pushing me towards him. It was my brother and I think a couple other friends. Of course lol. I was no longer feeling the vodka at that point, so I took grabbed the opportunity, because it's not every day you go clubbing and a cute guy puts himself out there to introduce himself to you right?
To break the endless song.
COLUMBIA – South Carolina’s current public employees would see little change in their pension benefits under a plan sent Thursday to the Senate floor, though a special retirement program would close in 2018.
"Mommy!" Dylan stands staring in my face at eye level with his dark brooding eyes, as I lay on the couch. He demands something in 2-year-old-'languagese' that I can't quite make out. "In a minute..." I weakly respond and he waddles off.
What appealed to me most was the cluricaunʼs reputation for drunkenness. Theyʼre always drunk. Itʼs their defining characteristic. In fact, some sources reckon the cluricaun is just a leprechaun on a bender after work - but not in my story, he wasnʼt. I even consciously went for the spelling without the ʻhʼ (it can also be rendered ʻclurichaunʼ) just to avoid any confusion with the green-jacketed little stereotype.
I hope you all had just as wonderful of a weekend...these are my absolute favorite kind- packed with fun, sun, work that makes you feel good, and love! I have a few recipes to share tomorrow from our delicious dinner on Saturday night, have a fab day! xo
Next post will be more fun.
directing traffic, managing electrical grids and resources, aiding doctors, lawyers and police, analyzing satellite data, optimizing manufacturing and design, developing new medicines and cures, leading to a third Industrial Revolution. Yet, the roboticization of the factory
The frenzy to privatize America’s K-12 education system, under the banner of high-tech progress and cost-saving efficiency, speaks to the stunning success of a public relations and lobbying campaign by industry, particularly tech companies. Because of their campaign spending, education-tech interests are major players in elections. In 2010, K12 Inc. spent lavishly in key races across the country, including a last-minute donation of $25,000 to Idahoans for Choice in Education, a political action committee supporting Tom Luna, a self-styled Tea Party school superintendent running for re-election. Since 2004, K12 Inc. alone has spent nearly $500,000 in state-level direct campaign contributions, according to the National Institute on Money in State Politics. David Brennan, Chairman of White Hat Management, became the second-biggest Ohio GOP donor, with more than $4.2 million in contributions in the past decade.
The phrase “sex work,” which first came into use in the late 1970s, has made its way into official channels and today is used by the United Nations. The feminist value of bodily autonomy, or the ability to choose what to do with one’s body, figures most prominently in feminist support for sex workers’ rights. The link with feminism in these geographic contexts aligns sex workers’ rights with the rights of usually white, cisgender (i.e., not transgender) women and often links it to reproductive rights and health.
Nicole has a handy group of girl friends, and each of us took on a small part of the wedding planning. I had the pleasure of designing the invitations and doing the wedding flowers. Nicole loves bright red and aqua, so she and I worked together to come up with an invitation that would represent her vintage inspired colors and decor, while keeping it clean and simple.
How long? He wondered.
Many musicians and bands use the excuse that they don’t know how to ask for reviews in a day where it is much easier than ever to get more reviews than ever.
Okay, this song is a bit mental...whenever I play it to anyone they kind of go wide-eyed and look to the floor and go 'Okaaaay.' because it is weird and so they think you're weird in turn for liking it. And when I first heard it I felt the same as they did as my mum looked at me eagerly and smiled at my reaction. I felt embarrassed...But then I accepted its weirdness and grew to love it and love Mike Oldfield for being eccentric and brave enough to do his own thing. Put this CD on in the car and I'm in seventh heaven. This album and I are of the same substance. Every inch of it. My atoms belong with these music atoms. It genetic and runs in the family.
Three years ago I wrote a post about aging and all that has and hasn't changed for me over the years. I also mentioned (in a subsequent response to a comment) that retirement was three years in the offing. Now I'm three years older and retirement is a mere five weeks away. I am tremendously excited about having free time, about not having to get up every morning and hurry off to work, about spending more time with my grandchildren without having to rush home at the beginning of the work week. I have a bucket list three miles long and can't wait to get started on it. There are some things about working (besides the regular paycheck) I will miss, though.
Here are three tips for knowing if you're idea is a keeper.
My idea for this was A Mid Summer Nights Dream, so I think it fits the current Crafty Individuals Challenge. When I was child I used to love making rosewater, you know gathering loads of fragrant petals and soaking them in water. It invariably went stagnant rather quickly though LOL, but rose perfume always reminds of a perfect balmy Summers evening.
Fine. Isn't that infinitely better?
New potatoes, sliced
Meal 2 of the vegetarian week
When I was five I rescued two lobsters, freeing them back into the ocean.
Code: Simplex chime: Marchtime chime ( it rhymes!). 9806: Marchtime.
3) Write a short article about what the blog has achieved - preferably citing one or more older pos(s) to support.
I only made 4 cupcakes, because I thought the muffin pan I was going to package them in was for 4. But as you can see it is for 6. So, I need to make 2 more. In the purple envelope is a bunch of different colors of hearts, flowers and butterflies. They all have velcro on them for easy decorating. The cupcakes themselves have velcro, too. The pattern showed the decorations sewed on, but I thought the girls would have more fun decorating them the way they wanted to.
What is session beer? If you know me you know what session beer is because you've probably heard me gripe about the lack of it for over two years, but for those that do not, I agree with the beer writer Lew Bryson on his definition of session beer:
Several months ago, I published a post on old newspaper movie ads which contained both family oriented films side by side with explicitly adult films. There's just something funny about seeing an like the one above from a 1972 Bangor newspaper, which has Snow White right alongside Twins of Evil and Hands of the Ripper.
10. From engaging in management to engaging in ministry
Your horse's response to the canter aid is "Can't, er, what?"
Rest it in the fridge for an hour. Then make 25 balls and roll them out in tongue shapes as mentioned in the cookbook (which I would love to own) or roll it out and cut it with a pastry cutter as mentioned by Deeba. I made them into different shapes as you can see but all of mine didn't come out too crsip. I would roll out the dough as thin as possible and and I had to bake it for almost 12 minutes unlike the 6 minutes mentioned. Remember to sprinkle your toppings and brush it with olive oil before baking!
Ken Taylor's work.....
I’m very grateful to those that have bought it. And I hope no one will be upset once it becomes free. But if my goal is to get my name out to a wider audience, I’m going to have to make this available for free indefinitely. And until Amazon makes that a viable option, I will using Smashwords.
"Me." I scoffed, "Nah. I've got no phobias."
Good value for your money!
Because I lurve purple so much... I couldn't stop at 1 piece... I did 2 (Fozzy Bear wokka, wokka, wokka!)
Are we mocking God when we choose to condescend to those we have deemed beneath ourselves?
pockets. . . Steel safes stand in corners. Money
If you suspected the newly released U.S. Religion Census overstated the LDS Church's growth rate, you were right. That's because, this time around, the Utah-based faith changed the way it reported its membership to the researchers.
The fact that these plants were in need of transplanting so early in the year is another indication to me that this year's spring will be abundant. Time will tell if my prediction proves to be correct.
Calgary – Third Wave on the airport property and First to Second Wave to get there. There used to be a workbench at the terminal for cyclists to use and where they could store bike boxes while touring the city.
Most all artists and creative people feel like frauds, we feel how easy our talents come to us, and we are continually wondering when we will be found out, that someone will catch on to the fact that we don’t really know what we are doing, because our talent moves through us, we don’t own it, we won’t claim it…yet it is ours. Throughout history the world’s most successful artists, inventors, scientists, entrepreneurs, writers, athletes, entertainers and other creative people have become successful because they have pursued their natural talents. They have allowed their light to shine, they cherished it, understood it’s power, and allowed their passion to carry them to where they were meant to go! This little light of mine, I’m gonna let it shine, let it shine let it shine around the world.
The name (IF chart) stands for Initial – Final chart. I originally referred to these as “momentum bar charts”, but that was soon shortened by students to “bar charts” and then became confusing to them once we had energy bar charts as well later in the year. So we now call the momentum bar charts IF Charts and the energy bar charts LOLs (post coming later this year), and the confusion is gone.
Flower cut from fabric with Tim Holtz...Tattered Florals Die
BF: Well, it’s there!
Forgive me for my long vacation from posting! I have been consumed by other, more pressing concerns in the last two or three weeks, and have not had the time or the energy to be more regular in my updates. I'm sure that you all know and understand about such things. Therefore, enough said!
Breakfast is for wusses! Beer is all the breakfast we need! Well, not this week. I will be eating fruit before I leave home, but I am making low fat blueberry muffins for everyone else (and I will have one too). I'm hoping this will allow me to eat lunch at a more normal time instead of having hot dogs at 9:00am because I am starving!
So I hope this encourages you, inspires and motivates you for some changes in your own life.
I still remember checking it out from the library and being so enthralled with the story that I begged my mom to buy it for me at the next book fair - remember those? I am convinced, now MANY years later, that the detailed descriptions in this book helped shape my creative mind. If Meg, Calvin, and Charles Wallace could move out of this world to save Dr. Murray then surely I could do anything I wanted, right? Amazing thought really, but books do inspire children. They cause them to think, to push the envelope of this world, and to reach out for the impossible.
Next one of my sweet friends saw one of thier neighbors put this small dresser/small buffet at the end of the driveway and grabbed it for me!
Until a few short months ago.
455. Wings @ Goose Island Wrigleyville (Chicago, IL) 7:35 p.m.
You know what I mean.
Alright, here's another comparison for you guys...
In case tomorrow never comes
or with them.
Can you imagine their surprise
My husband would not watch this episode if they didn't save the girl. I kept expecting someone to walk in and think they were attacking her. Phew that they just saved her, after poor Dean getting kicked in the face a few times. I thought the actress probably had a lot of fun with that scene, but I might have been projecting.
"I'd have been bollocked for doing something like that," he shouted.
Depends on the trap. Anyone can find a trap. Don't often play with thieves because I believe all the classes are thieves. Having said that I now have TWO thieves in the party lol.
So like a true aussie woman i shall endure and soldier on!!!
He walked in the same door his parents used every day; the same door that the man with the gun
San Diego Jails to House State Inmates: “Very Scary Prospect”
I also am feeling rather cross about the fact that my page-a-day calendar is through. Must motor to the nearest Christian bookstore and buy another one. I can't be without my daily picture and scripture to riiiiiiiiip off every morning. Something so satisfying about riiiiiiiping off that page. (edited to add: we motored to the Christian book store and I found myself a very Grandma'ish Thomas Kinkade daily calendar. I would have rather had a stunning scenic landscape, but I will endure 366 days of Thomas Kinkade. I will. Todays scripture is Revelation 21:5, you should go read it.)
Both babies are still in newborn clothes and diapers.
These are just a few of the things that put me into a bad mood. I just feel that people can really be better than what they normally are. Another thing I get upset at is lazy people. Ahhhhhhh. I have to stop. Just typing the statement lazy people frustrates me. People are good and should focus on making themselves better people. I’m going to do this for myself and going to try not to focus on what everyone else is doing. I can only control one person and that’s me. Smile, have a great day and have fun at what ever you do.
VESTRI OPTI: Cultural awareness in business and how to behave in business situations abroad is an increasingly hot topic. Please say something about managers working in a culture not their own – how to minimize cultural mistakes by managers?
I watched them scurry off around the corner. I knew they would at the very least be listening in. I was rather comforted by that.
“Here you go. Bring them right to her.”
Canson 300 g watercolorpaper
The very brief exchange between Mr. Shiftlet and the boy is an odd one. The boy in the red hat appears to be more of a sign than a character. The strained dialogue calls into question the veneer of Southern Christian culture which is always ready to present a front of Christian sounding language without requiring a deeper commitment to the Christian life– a life centered on the self-sacrificing love of Christ refracted in the sacrificial love of parents for children and spouses for each other. The venom spewed by the boy in the bright red hat is a rebellion against the non-penetrating veneer of Southern Christian chatter. If Christian love is just talk, why live? The boy’s self immolation is a twisted image of Christ’s self-sacrifice on the cross, the latter is replete with love and meaning and promise of resurrection, the former is an empty, senseless death.
When it comes down to it, people hire people they like. Entreleadship taught me how to be the leader that attracts the right people, how to be the right person, before you grow the right company, because as its well known, “how you are in the small things, is how you are in the large things”.
Editor Paula Green will be joined by a list of esteemed contributors
Radio is screen-free, right? Town Hall meetings are, too!
He has a lingering low fever today, so of course he is home from school.
I still wanted to adopt but I did NOT want to be a foster parent. I did not want to care for the fatherless in this way. There was too much at risk for me emotionally. After all, I was doing my part by taking care of the orphans in Sierra Leone, right Lord? Isn't that enough? You see I tend to love very deeply, which can also bring a lot of pain. I do not like pain!
The treaty of Biak na Bato cut the Spanish forces in Baler from 400 to 50 men.
Prefill the bags:
Author Interview:
As an attendee, I received a sample of each of the four dinner sauces, described below, and a few other goodies from Hunt's including a set of Sur la Table mini-prep bowls which I can't wait to use in my new kitchen.
Driving vs. walking up and down stairs
“And the Word was made flesh, and dwelt among us, (and we beheld His glory, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of grace and truth.” John 1:14
Apologies to regular What’s for Lunch? readers for the unexplained absence. But I have an excuse and it’s actually food-related. I’ve been eating my way through Italy. Gelato, granite, bucatini all’ amatriciana, carciofo all guidia— you say it (with a charming Italian accent) I ate it.
”ITMA and CIPA are working together to put a programme in place for ‘non-core skills’. These are everything an IP attorney needs in the job apart from IP work itself. Things like confidentiality, ethics, quality management, employment law, company law and records management, so that we can all be the best employers and employees and firms.”Confidentiality and ethics might be "non-core" in so far as they aren't "IP work", but he thinks they are at least as core to the activities of IP practitioners as meeting office deadlines, drafting applications and all the nitty gritty stuff. Can a better term than "non-core" be found? Something like "absolutely essential and don't even think of entering the profession unless you can handle this", perhaps?
BUT... that's not why you came. I just wanted to give everyone the heads up, Big Day, a comedy about one couple's wedding day starts Tuesday, November 28th at 9:00 on ABC. The entire season takes place in one day, with each episode covering an hour of the day. I must admit, I have my reservations. If the decor they chose is an indicator of the quality of the show, it may never make it to the vows. Balloons? Really?
Last up, I'm really unsure about Margarito and Pacman. 3 months ago I would have said Pacman would get him out of there in 5. But now, after all these reports I'm leaning more towards Margarito. It seems to me like the Pacman camp and Arum have all made up excuses already and the fight hasn't even happened yet. This seems odd to me. Maybe its not necessarily Pacman looking bad, but maybe he's struggling in sparring because he can't handle the length and relentless pressure of Margarito.
What are your home goals this year?
Maple Apple Onion Relish
Papers--Unknown maker by all from Stamp N Scrap
St. Pius X, pray for us!
Practically speaking, the lot wasn’t all that great. In the full foliage of summer, the highway noise emanating from the junction of interstates 35 and 635 was a bit muted and the bright lights of the public storage facility behind the lot were shaded from view. In the winter, not so much.
Phew... I finally made another card... it's been a while since i've made 1... I was down with a cold last week.. But i'm getting better..
Inside the Assembly building, there was humiliation for the newly installed speaker Ganesan. He did not know the Standing Orders well enough to handle proceedings, and the Pakatan representatives laughed out loud at him. Since the BN had announced his elevation to Speaker long before their putsch, it must be assumed that he did not have the time, or intellectual capacity, to have read through the Standing Orders beforehand.
“So then,” Ted said, “Malcolm X was a racist douche bag…according to your philosophy.”
One of the other main reasons that I order replicas is that I'm tall and I prefer to have custom size dresses. When I ordered this one, I ended up with a dress that was way too big right under the arms. Even with the back shirring corset at its smallest, it was still too large around the upper bust area (maybe 5 cm too big on each side, which is a lot). I still don't understand what happened, I entered the proper measurements. I do believe, though, that it's not QutieLand's fault, because during the same period of time, I ordered an Halloween costume from another site and it came in the exact same way.
After a cold Melbourne winters day after witnessing The Bombers devastating ANZAC day defeat to the Pies, my partner in crime, Andy Smith, and I were looking for the warmth of a good cocktail bar, a humble bartender to chat to and a tasty tipple to heat-up the cockles of our heart.
It was a bat.
The paintings in this art show are all at different levels of "completeness"; some blank, some with the structure of the painting roughed on with black paint, some with the first touches of colour added and finally, others that are finished and ready to be sold.
The MSN is the node that handles the mobile intelligent network (IN) services.
Auntie Marlene (aka Yaya): Yaya is so organized and driven which is completely opposite of me. Give her a potential problem and she will research and find the best way to resolve anything. You're not sure about something, she will track down any information available and then map out a plan to make it happen. Yaya wants to know everything about what's going on in my kids lives so that she can make sure they are getting treated correctly and they are getting the best out of every situation. She's a do-er. When the kids ask me for information and I don't know the answer, I tell them to ask Auntie Yaya.
Homemade Hamburger Rolls
...the actual cause of our impatience lies within our own hearts, in our own attitude of insisting that others around us conform to our expectations.
So now we are making those who are oppressed defend themselves and explain why the fact that they are being oppressed is offensive to them. This outrages me.
scrubbing coal dust from his back
Write, definitely. There’s a Sylvia Plath quote that goes something like, ‘I write because there is a voice in me that will not be still.’ I definitely find that to be true. I’d go mad if I couldn’t at least keep a journal, someplace where I could organize my thoughts and put my world to rights.
Oh yeah, Happy belated Holidays all.
Identification Rotund, stocky medium-size icterid with a long expenses, short longest tail, strong feet, and indicated longest tail down. Summer adult: cryptically designed above; bright yellow-colored below with daring dark-colored V on chest. Title darkish with bright average crown red stripe, dark-colored postocular red stripe, otherwise yellow-colored supralores stand out on the paler face. Heated strong flanks crisply streaked darkish. Back down surrounded bright, but have complicated design of strong, and dark darkish in centers. Fresh wildlife have a scaly look due to complete light fringing of down. Coverts warm darkish with dark-colored cafes that expand and meet next dark-colored cafes at the feather base. In the same way, central longest tail down show confluent dark-colored cafes along base. External 3 longest tail down mostly or entirely bright. Bill grey with dark culmen and tip, feet unexciting lilac, eyes dark-colored. Winter weather adult: Pale tips impair the dark-colored V on chest. A little bit more buffy yellow-colored underparts; scaly upperparts. Juvenile: just like winter mature, but paler yellow-colored below and chest V streaked.
Wedding Location: 3 contenders. Bentonsport, Iowa. Beverley Shores,
Don’t Stop Believin’ – Glee Soundtrack
Sometimes our motives twist and need readjusting. Deep in our heart, we occasionally slip into acting out of a desire to be seen, noticed and praised. Or we take on a task because it feels good to be needed and asked. We fear that no one else could possibly do it, so we sign on the dotted line.
Suddenly his mouth tasted bitter and he spat at the pavement near him. He had chewed at the most rotten part of the apple.
your body to your feet which connect you to Mother Earth. So use this energy tool to refreshen your spirit and cleanse your aura. It is a gift from heaven!
Already I'm amazed at what HE has accomplished and I'm thrilled He is letting me be a part of this journey.
The first time we met it was dark outside and I was walking down the street. I was pregnant with our youngest. I will translate that since you don’t know me well enough yet…
The Americans cast here...well, to be honest, I'd never heard of them before this and I don't remember seeing them anywhere else. Of course, I'd never seen Rhodes Reason's many TV Western appearances nor Linda Miller's sole other movie appearance in If Footmen Tire You What Will Horses Do? - of course after being in a movie with a bovine-eyed ape, anything else is bound to be a letdown.
Somehow all but 4 of our "stand-by" Resurrection eggs were missing and i kept seeing great alternatives, like this Resurrection Garden above, get passed around during the month of March and kept thinking, "yes. that would be good. my kids would like those. i should really do these readings, or those fun crafts"
More broadly, it really helps people gain a sense of place and the social and cultural life of their town. The internet well serves communities of interest we believe are pioneering more difficult serving of a geographical community.
"Hello all,
I’ve written this quote a million and one times before but I’ll write it again
Avnet Technology Solutions has expanded its SolutionsPath methodology in conjunction with innovative partner programme aimed at extending technology expertise to support their channel ecosystem of partners. The first part of this programme was the launch of Avnet StoragePath University which was held in Singapore in February.
This morning I was really nervous about the ultrasound. You know, I think what I hate the most about RPL (aside from the actual death of ones’ babies) is getting very bad news from strangers and having to react to it right there. I can prepare myself for a bad result – to a degree – but the anticipation of dealing with but the pity and awkwardness from the ultrasound tech and the doctor and the nurses trying to comfort you and ugh. Techs have acted differently for me during Bad News Ultrasounds – from saying “it could still turn around!” to very businesslike and I hate having to deal with raw emotions right there in front of strangers. I wish I could just scan myself and get the news in private. How much do ultrasound machines cost, you think?
The grain bill, if you're interested, is malted barley, raw barley and maize - don't know what the hops are but I'm taking a punt they are Saaz, as that's what's used in the original - and provided they haven't gone overboard with the maize it could be a good start.
Doesn't look like it's going that way
Nick: “Uhmm…McDonalds. A Happy Meal”
At first I thought that Cox's Avery didn't seem to be particularly broken up by the death of Red, but you'll understand why over time. There's far more going on than the death of a dog. Shocking revelations are made. There's a fist-pumpin' moment with a baseball bat. Robert Englund wears a vest.
“Don’t tell me you read him!”
Was Plankton named for small aquatic organisms, or do they refer to themselves as “The City of Boards.”
If you choose to bake it as shapes, place dough shapes onto parchment paper and bake for 12-15 minutes.
It wasn't all that wonderful
The deputy head of EU delegation to Serbia, Adriano Martins, was also in attendance. Serbia has been under major pressure to advance the human rights situation of the Roma, and pledged back in December to try to make citizenship more widely available at the UNHCR conference of ministers. So far, however, they have done exactly nothing to implement the 1961 Convention or improve their poorly organized birth registration laws. As it stands, persons are required to present an identity to card to register the birth of their child and therefore, children of legally invisible persons are rendered legally invisible themselves. Since I am working on this issue right now, I have some unofficial, opinionated recommendations for what they should attempt do with this MoU:
“Tommy, watch out!”
This time the wort collected and OG is as expected.
Once again I bring up an example of a personal situation not as an attempt to gloat about a large account, although it was my biggest account at that agency, but to show that relationships are key to sales and life is all about sales. I did not approach the account thinking there was no way I could land it because it was so big. I just figured out what the best thing was for the client, let them know how I was going to do that for them and executed my word.
“You think they’ll come in after us to clean up?” Pappy seemed incredulous.
England.
Her several parts could keep a pure repose,
1/2 cup bread crumbs
Mr Baey also stressed that Singapore laws applied equally to Singaporeans and foreigners alike:
However, even if you have no interest in doing the writer any good, or B&N any good, or agents any good, it's still worthwhile because the real person you're helping is the potential reader who can now find a book looking where they should (and not confusing someone who found the book in the inappropriate section).
bee stamps, various
DESIGNER and entrepreneurs who produce Beauty, Fashion & Accessories:- all categories,
The EDL is an inclusive group of real people - human beings. You are right that extreme Islam is fascist and that the UAF have never stood up against this fascism. People who speak out against extreme Islam are called racist or bigoted. It is Islamic extremism that is racist, bigoted and full of hate for women. Islamic fundamentalists are fascists.
Art wasn't hurt in the mishap but he did have to walk up to headquarters and admit that he really didn't know how to fly a B-17. Punky said the guy he talked to took pity on him.
PS … The Star Elders really do love drama, and so does Archangel Michael; but they never go in to sympathetic resonance with the drama. For them it is just like watching a really good movie. They don’t judge anything and just accept the process. If we can approach this year as they do, it will make our lives a lot easier.
but chocolate Barbie got my heart quakin’
Overall both beers were very good and I was quite impressed with both efforts. Keep the free beer coming and I will continue to rate it. I have always said that my favorite beer is free beer.
The New Memories Vacation Package Includes:
Evening all
Results may vary.
Larry, I hate to say this, but you’re an idiot.
Lagarde, however, let the cat out of the bag. When she was previously French finance minister, she claimed there was no problem with the French banks. Since taking over as head of the IMF, however, she has called for a recapitalisation of the major French banks and other banks in trouble using the EFSF funds. There has been a furious reaction against this. On the one hand, any such bailout would confirm that these banks have a solvency problem, and could actually exacerbate their situation. On the other, existing shareholders are up in arms because a government bailout (which would involve the government buying shares in the banks) would effectively dilute the value of shares of existing shareholders.
My only relative complaint is about the album. It’s great, and deserves to be huge because she deserves to be huge, but it’s done with a band and multi-tracking and over dubbing, which is just what you’d expect from a studio album. Her show, stripped down so that we can hear that gorgeous voice at its best, delivers those same songs – along with her early hits, great songs like “Back of my Hand” and “Ran for Miles”, and a wonderful cover of Kate Bush’s “Cloudbusting” – straight to the bloodstream, almost intravenously.
Doctor: “Well, that’s because they go to college undeclared and become, like, business majors. You can’t get a job as a business major.”
Kanpai to SakeOne!
From the kitchen of Veronica Spears
“I was expecting eight, maybe ten, to say yes. But then they all said yes and so it meant coordinating 24 people. Fortunately they were all fantastic to work with.”
but it produces cool sounds. Even when I play it.
And why does that kind of question always lead to an answer in the form of a harsh reality that it can get worse. I heard something that, up until now, I figured to be impossible. Something that baffles my fragile mind even now.
But we have got to protect that kidney. We have got to do everything we can, even have knock-down, drag-out, biting-mommy-on-the-shoulder-until-she-hands-over-my-muenster fights in front of the fridge to do that. We need it to last two more years. At least, at least, two more years.
What’s fading, though, is the value for small businesses that could once attach themselves to the newspaper advertising juggernaut. What used to be a sure thing, no longer is.
So far, the only one that has not received rave reviews from my family is Dale's Caramel -- it seems to be the most heavily coated of all the varieties (the rest of the sweet ones are merely drizzled), and it is cloyingly sweet. I'm wondering whether the Cinnamon Creme DrizzleCorn will be the same way... I'll update this post once I've tried it.
That first night at home, my husband helped me get the boys to bed, and then he crashed out on the couch about fifteen minutes later. I remember sitting at the end of my bed looking out my window. I had to figure a way to change what happened. I started going through everything in my head, and figure out a way to save Isaiah's life. I came so close to calling my doctor at her house and letting her know how we can "change" what happened. I had only been a CRAZY WOMAN that first night. I told my mom about it the next day. I look back, and realize that I should not have been alone that first night.
The music this man and this group produced was phenomenal and was another who accomplished writing our 60′s counter-culture soundtrack.
So some plans have needed changing.
"I just can't get over her skin. It's like my fingers are more alive when I touch her. She doesn't shave much or anything, but even her armpit hair is just so fine and downy. Just so... perfect. Just, love her so much. She's her own person, you know, a proper strong woman, not one of these pink wearing idiots with too much make up. She's real."
SH: But there was a big strawberry in the middle, so I didn't eat that much after all.
Another of those little KC Dolman jackets. I enjoyed working the first one so much, after the initial worry over what I was actually doing, that I cast on this next one straight away. Haven't got too far have I? Well at least pulling it out of it's bag has reminded me that I owe Dawn an email (thanks for your pm btw - the patterns would be lovely and you got the email address right x).
Elizabeth says to get over that intimidating thought construct she had to "Create a distance between me and my expectations of my writing since that freakish success." Her way of doing that was to come up with a new way of thinking about creativity, and that search led her to Ancient Greece, and Ancient Rome. Back then, people did not "believe creativity came from human beings...creativity was a devine attendant spirit that came to human beings from some distant and unknowable source."
April 2008: Tobacco Journal International runs as its cover story “Plain Packaging can kill your business.” (ed: that’s the whole idea)
my true intent,
And with that, we have all the pieces we need to set our story in motion. A sympathetic hero/heroine, a villain, and a drive. With that proclamation from the mirror, our story is set in motion. We have a villain who wants something and a hero that prevents them from getting it. Everything that follows will spring from that basic story. All the details that follow are window dressing for that one simple story: Will Snow White escape the jealous Queen and live happily ever after? The dwarves, the Huntsman, the Prince, the poison apple, the glass coffin… all of that serves the central question.
The greatest way to improve each other’s lives is not through money, gifts, good advice, or even work, but through love.
Why is this topic – this practice, this lifestyle – so important?
my mom made all of her bedding and also the bedside lamps - i'll give details on that later!
My nieces and nephew love to bake with me (unlike my own children, who just enjoy eating it). Lately on Friday night's while my son is golfing I've been hanging out at their house and last night was no different, except this time they asked me to bring over some stuff to make. I loaded up my laundry basket, looked up some of my "to-bake list" on Pinterest and baked this wonderful little treat. I actually came up with a huge list to make and after about five-hours in the kitchen we didn't exactly make everything we had hoped for, but there is always next Friday night! We did make these adorable little Hamburger Cupcakes, some amazing chicken strips and potatoes and a few other fun little things.
MENTAL HEALTH
I remember once, she was teaching a database class, a topic where she was expert and my knowledge was skimpy. Microsoft had just released its first database program. Students were clamouring for it. The program was full of bugs and constantly crashing. I went into the classroom to assist Kathy. She was practically distraught. She wanted to cancel the class. In her mind, if the program crashed while she was teaching, the students would blame her personally, not Microsoft, who was releasing software not ready for prime time, nor the University of Oregon Portland Center, who was offering a dubious and unready program to satisfy student demands.
Have I ever mentioned I hate hypochondriacs?
Then He said to them, “ Why do you sleep? Rise and pray, lest you enter into temptation.”
liquefied bodies
Love time be
We have been talking in the last few post about God Encounters and today I really want you to get the point of it all.
flours
Another cost that's often overlooked in the hand versus machine washing debate is the cost of the machine's manufacture, freight from the place of manufacture to where you buy it, and then to home. Add to that the waste they become when they break down or wear out. All these costs have to be weighed up and considered. If you have a large family, work outside the home and have little home time, you'll probably decide you're willing to pay the various costs. If, like me, you're in a small family with occasional large family groups, you might think the cost is too high and hand wash. Either way though, it's a private decision for all of us. As always I don't expect you to follow what we do here; I expect you to do what suits you and the way you work and be proud of that.
There are no side effects to Kegel exercises.
I created a bed out of an old cardboard box and some more old towels. It was amazing how many old towels I had, as though I’d been stockpiling them for this very occasion. I positioned the box in the far corner of the kitchen, coaxed the dog in with some slivers of ham and then told him it was bedtime. I flicked off the light and remained standing in the kitchen for a few seconds, to ensure he wouldn’t get up again. He didn’t. I crept from the room.
I've also been working on something else with pen and watercolours. Its still a work-in-progress, as although it is 'finished' and framed, I'm not entirely satisfied, so am tweaking some bits. But here is a sneak preview...
We rarely got sent to the office in those days. Generally, we just got sent out to the hallway…I mean other people got sent to the hall, not me..well, except for this one time in English but it wasn’t my fault!
trying to fight of evil Sauron, but didn't succeed and that's why she redoubled her watchfulness in Lorien in which she had escaped after Sauron had destroyed her kingdom of Eregion. It's most probable that Cate Blanchett will be also used as the narrator of the whole story as she did in LORD OF THE RINGS too.
Cut out cookies to shape as desired.
I’ll start first with your Daddy. Your Daddy is simply the sweetest, kindest, funniest, most loving man I have ever met. When I’m not busy taking him for granted (which fortunately isn’t all that often!!), I marvel at how lucky I am to be his wife. His faith, his devotion to his family, his strength, his compassion toward his loved ones, friends, even complete strangers is awe-inspiring. I wish that every girl could be as lucky as I am. “To know him is to love him,” should be his slogan. Some of my favorite moments are listening to him play with your older brother and sister. I love how he makes them laugh and his unique way of making them feel special and loved. He can cheer me out of the worst mood and can make me laugh till I feel like I can’t breathe! I love that he loves to make me laugh. Every morning before he leaves for work he pulls the covers off of me so he can kiss my belly, lovingly stroke you and wish you a good morning. Oh, how he loves you!!
3' x 5' Bamboo Matt with Spencerian Script
The Protestant and, in particular, the Calvinist tradition believed wealth was a sign of election, that is, salvation which could only come from God and not through the will of the believer. Nowadays, this religious element has been largely stripped from the explanation for why wealth is distributed as it is. Rather, in place of "election" we have "talent and hard work." No doubt in many cases talent and hard work actually figure into the outsized success of certain individuals. I am confident that my dentist did not succeed in learning how to fill cavities and prepare crowns by mere chance. And, I am more than satisfied that violinists who appear at Carnegie Hall have trained at length to warrant such an appearance.
“Poor Lisa. You know. It all sounds a bit like you’re a little bit jealous to me. I’m sure there are other important roles in the play and I’m sure you will play your role very well. You’ll always be my little princess anyway, even if you don’t get the leading role.”
Jónsi will be bringing these songs to life with an extensive world tour throughout 2010. for more details on this, along with exclusive jónsi news, music and information, please check out www.jonsi.com
Like I wrote, he's done two previous inspections for me, but this was the first time that he said, "You've got a great house. You were lucky to find it - this one is a keeper."
Almost all the roads are paved, and the main thoroughfares are in pretty good shape. There are traffic lights at all major intersections (even if they aren't always well-timed). This is something many posts cannot claim, and I don't take it for granted (even though I can't drive - but I spend an awful lot of time riding in backseats of vans, and paved roads do in fact make a difference!).
Rosie Burton (bassoon)
If I ever made a dessert calling for ricotta, I wanted to use Polly-O. Well, the time came. A ricotta cheesecake recipe from Bon Appetit caught my eye and I made it Tuesday, without the accompanying orange-caramel sauce. The graham cracker crust holds a mixture of cream cheese and ricotta boosted with orange zest vanilla bean seeds and vanilla extract.
Oh, kiss me now
Today’s topic is about being accessible and responsive to your audience. It is one thing to have an inbox where people can send you a message, and it is an entirely other thing to reply to those messages. I’ve highlighted a few websites and blogs in previous posts. Last week I mentioned Chris Guillebeau author of The Art of Non-Conformity in my post about growing your followers. My blogging guru friend Jay Dampier suggested I send Chris an e-mail telling him I’ve mentioned him in my blog. So, listening to Jay (like I always do), I sent off an e-mail to Chris mentioning the blog. I also asked him if he had any criticisms or feedback. I’d love to hear it. Within 4 hours he sent me the following reply:
So for this card I used some awesome new valentines paper that I had gotten, along with some ribbon and for the candy box I used a glitter pen to add some sparkle and crystal effects on each piece of candy and the bow to give it a glossy affect.
Furthermore, aid cuts also affect LGBTI people. Aid received from donor countries is often used to fund education, health and broader development. LGBTI people are part of the social fabric, and thus part of the population that benefit from the funding. A cut in aid will have an impact on everyone, and more so on the populations that are already vulnerable and whose access to health and other services are already limited, such as LGBTI people.
3. Add your beating egg slowly...a crumbly pastry dough should start forming...
You will have to complete this task one handed, so make sure that you feel for the side so that you don’t hit it with either yourself or miss completely and end up dropping the food on the floor.
That's my grandmother, my Nanny Goat.
It sounded like a book about bad dogs. Clearly, I am just the person for the job.
"Cheryl" from all of us here at Bizzy Becs, Thankyou so very, very much.
Sampler is. Oh well.
Acccording to the latest rumors the Iphone 5 shall come to us in a liquidmetal body and a larger screen, making it more competable with market competitors like the Samsung Note for instance.
What is you hidden talent
Creek-Stone 8 oz. Filet Mignon With
I am, of course, hired immediately.
1 eels
Also, I'll be changing up the sale items throughout the month of December and adding new items too, so keep checking back to see what's new!
Can we stop this ride?
shining on her hair and I really like how it turned out!
I still believe that the most important aspect of any relationship is communication, but my humility and patience (and a car ride) are needed to achieve it.
‘Holy crap.’ Was all Mac could think to say.
The boy has been doing a lot of playing and walking lately. We're especially glad that he's walking pretty much full time and has figured out how to stay upright while wearing shoes; that skill took a while. It's a lot easier to let him play in the backyard now. Watching him attempt to crawl around back there wasn't that fun, he didn't really enjoy it either. Toddling around the yard is obviously where it's at.
I don't know if it was enterprise-architected or just architected by, you know, architects. But either way, I'll take a nice uni-tenant environment any day.
Taste: This was quite dry, with citrus and some earthy herbal notes, too. It was quite smooth, despite the strength; subtle; and rather classic in terms of style.
Prepare the cinnamon filling:
- 3 x 0.07 oz Eye Shadows in Tufted Suede (soft tan), Velveteen Bunny (ivory), Fresh Linen (pale pink)
Dr Mercola is sharing a marvelous interview with Dr. James Oschman on EARTHING. Actually this is one of David Wolfe’s favorite topics, so I am very familiar with the subject and been wishing that I could avail some of these tools. But you know, the way this doctor is explaining it, we don’t have to go buy something, if we would just take this advice and do a few simple things – no money at all.
I've really started to take this redesign thing seriously but my brain failed me when I attempted to be original and think up, and design this thing all on my own. So now I'm doing the second best thing - looking at other sites, trying to pick up ideas.
2. Not let interruptions begin, in the first place. Bad, leather chair, bad. Sounds like I’m kidding, but fact is, this chair is aimed at the tv, in a room crowded with the boys’ toys, causing stifling chi even when the tv is off. I know this to be true. The trick is to know yourself and not invite the disaster in to begin with. I should have begun the day in the room where I knew I worked more productively.
The Garden Seed Organiser:
The Marlins are aggressively pursuing top free agents and putting up big dollars for them in anticipation of the increased revenue that comes along with a new stadium. In 2009, when the Yankees and Mets moved to their respective new ballparks. The Yankees went on to win the World series that year against the Philadelphia Phillies. Meanwhile in Flushing, the New York Mets finished 70-92 and fourth in their division above only the lowly Nationals. The Miami Marlins have potential to have a season like the ’09 Yankees, yes, but if they finish in the bottom of the division, like the Mets did, the new stadium schtick will get old fast.
We have donated $143 since opening my Etsy shop. (I say "we" because my past customers are partnering with me in these donations...whether they know it or not!) As loans are repaid, I re-loan the money, which means that we have been able to loan $200 total so far. There is $129 still being repaid and that will be re-loaned as well, which will bring the grand total of money loaned to $329 for an investment of $143.
Trust me in this…the providence of God rules over the smallest concerns of all of us. Not a sparrow falls to the ground without Him being aware. In His time, the greatest time of all time, you will be honoured and recognized for your faithfulness, passion, desires of your heart, attitude and character of Christ pursued, practicing the presence of God, serving in love, standing when everything around you says give up… you will be honoured, you will be recognized, you will have a testimony to the amazing providence of God in your life!
Bevere is also insinuating that Jesus says that many will be deceived by this faulty democratic thinking in regards to the kingdom of God.
Chesterfield has amended its county code 13-71 a couple of times, massaging the wording enough to make this double penalty legal, they believe.
This half-hour Chevrolet / General Motors sponsored “infomercial” (the Jam Handy Organization, 1958) is a great little overview of the range of American industrial design from the late 1950s. Watching it makes you wonder what exactly happened to the exuberance, optimism and trust in design that was so universally shared that a major American manufacturer would sponsor the short Technicolor film and play it in movie theaters across the country.
¼ tsp Hing/Asafoetida
1. The Landing Beacon - 6:56
“On average twice a day! Provided that I was lying on the sofa! Without me nothing happened. If I stood up he ended his games straight away!’
1/2 tablespoon minced onion
It is a little bud vase, from the Highbank Porcelain Factory at Lochgilphead – another pottery in Argyll and Bute.
This has been known for some time, but no one could see the third star until they turned the Hubble Space telescope on it in 2006. That’s when NASA released the first image of this third companion. The accompanying press release explained it this way:
Sabathia has now won 10 games on the road in three straight years, becoming the first modern day starter to accomplish the feat since Pedro Martinez.
Sterilization as a medical measure is a serious personal responsibility. On … sterilization or other surgery to prevent conception … the Church has felt that it was the individual responsibility of the couple; and while the Church leaves it to the individual to determine whether the ill health of the mother is sufficient to warrant the surgery which would make pregnancy impossible, yet it is a definite personal responsibility. In your case, since the surgery has already been completed, it cannot be undone, so it must be accepted as a fact and life can go on. Both parents should give themselves totally and fully to the rearing of their six children which they now have in a loving home with ideal surroundings.
The next new thing(s) I cooked were for an impromptu dinner party! One of my high school friends and I along with her youhger sister and another high school friend have had a standing date for dinner on Thursday nights. It started as dinner at our homes switching off every week then evolved into dinner out all the time. Since my husband is job hunting and we have no real income to speak of, I haven't been doing this, but I still wanted to get together with my friends, so I asked them over. I was going to make the Old Fashioned Meatloaf for dinner anyway. I just added some salad with the BLT dressing, some canned cream corn and a dessert which I decided to make the Silky Chocolate Mousse Pie. I also made Velveeta shells and cheese for our overly picky kids I hate fighting about food with company over so I give her an out.
That’s the other thing about listening to the gut; you don’t just pay attention, you do something about it. And that’s not hard once you do it. That’s all. Nothing else complex about it. (I recommend cultivating the skill. Life saver!)
A short distance down a hedge lined lane, I come to an important landmark on the North Downs Way. As the fingerpost suggests, it is here, 98 miles from Farnham, that the eastwards trail divides in two. Both branches eventually reach Dover, one via Canterbury and the other, which I have been following from Wye, via Folkestone. I take the Canterbury path, burrowing through dense overarching blackthorn hedges to emerge on a track. It has the feel of an ancient trackway: on a terrace, raised above the fields downslope to the south, lined with lime trees and some impressively large (and old) specimens of field maple, decaying timber from which, white with mycelium and smelling wonderfully mushroomy, lies on the ground.
Good morning stamping friends! I get to help you start a new week with some Sweet 'n Sassy elegance! Taylor hosted the "Hump Day" challenge for me over at Splitcoaststampers this week due to a family emergency. Thank you, Taylor! The challenge was to use faux or real stitching, so a little bit of real sewing was done to create this sample.
The first challenges (both different) are posted in each forum....Celebration theme, and an awesome sketch! Be sure to check them out! Go snag your freebie and play for a chance to win MORE free stuffs from Some Odd Girl!
The wedding was performed at The Redeemed Christian Church of God,Ogba,Lagos,and the reception was held a day later also in Lagos.
This film is a significant Disclosure in and of itself. Drop this link to your friends if you are interested — as this can definitely help increase the speed with which these hidden truths become public knowledge.
But if you want to reach out to a world audience, and are somewhat serious about blogging, then I urge you to use WordPress. It takes more time to get used to, but it gives you so many more features.
Anyway, by the time I went to bed last night, I was wishing for a do-over of the day. No, I didn't yell at anyone or fly off the handle, or stomp around. But I had a spell of miserable-ness that started with those thoughts of things like, "this is too much."..."I am tired of doing this AGAIN", and so on. I therefore missed out on things I should have been doing, like talking to these guys, ect. blah. But sometimes one has to learn the hard way. It is so easy to sit here and type how the kids are more important than the house...but when things start getting messy, what do I do? I see I need much more longsuffering, much more patience, more kindness.
Anyway, I must say a massive “thank you” to all those who sent in comments after my last blog about how Sherlock might have managed to fake his own suicide. Clearly the debate still rages and even One Show presenter Alex Jones mentioned the mystery on Monday night’s show. It’s fantastic to hear/read of so many diverse people discussing Holmes – especially in the context of a riddle, an intellectual problem which I think Sir Arthur himself would have loved. This has to have a positive effect on the legacy of the character and generate new readers turning to the original canon. The character of Sherlock Holmes will stay alive in our collective consciousness and remain popular as long as people keep discussing him.
The perception of brown-eyed men as more dominant is thus due to their more masculine facial appearance—and not to their brown eyes. The authors suggest that some kind of sex linkage may be responsible, while adding: “Repeating this study in other populations with polymorphism in eye color can test this hypothesis.”
Qui-Qui in a Hologram, Samij Datta 2012
Here’s to a delicious season! Cheers!
A filigree of shade
Then, he tells me that I'm looking not so pretty this morning, but that's ok, he'll get over it because he likes me anyway (um...thanks?). He keeps trying to ask me out and where I had been for the last week or so. I finally said that I had been on vacation with a guy I was dating (yes, I lied, and I have no shame...) and he gets quiet for a second and then says. Oh, well I bet it's not serious, and even if it is, you can still go out and date me.
Lord Jesus Christ, Son of God, deliver me from self-love and vainglory, and give me love.
or had each other less
“He spent his time in war-torn countries where help was needed, where people were desperate and that was Ken’s role in life.”
Hope everyone had a great weekend!
I will never forget you for you have a place in my heart thats reserved only for you.
That is all for now cyberpals. I will write more after her appointment next week.
The lack of eggs meant that I could have a taste of the uncooked batter. Rather annoyingly on this one occasion I didn't really fancy it. However, it would have been rude not to try it. If it had not been for the overwhelming kick of treacle it might have been alright; it was very strong! As I spread the mixture into my lined traybake tin it soon became clear that I had barely enough to cover the bottom of the tin; spreading it took me longer than making the actual cake! It was going to be as thin as a pancake if it didn't rise in the oven!
Ok folks, we have more sale bottles in stock! I know it’s not quite bottling time yet, but if you’ve got the space it might not hurt to pick up these bottles while they are available at these amazing prices! 750 ml Green Claret (Bordeaux) $6/case?!? Can that be right? YES! 90 cases available so get them quick.
Crème awoke being roughly skaken. It was still dark.
In winding-sheets are seen.
Point is, this is a great album to throw on to piss off your lady friend and impress your bros with.
Me: Eh….I would much rather stay under the covers, watch tv, and eat Grand Slams for breakfast everyday!
AMERICAN WOMEN CHILDREN'S ILLUSTRATORS collection
When Sartre realised he’d left his wallet at home, Simone was happy to pay. “Buying is a profound pleasure,” she said, keeping hold of JP’s ticket. A whizz with thoughts, he was not to be trusted with a square of paper.
How many times have we worked in our work life the same way each time only because it was the way we did it last time? What if God has a better way? What if God has a different plan than ours? “So David inquired of God…” These are the important words that we are to learn from. We must be in such relationship with God that we are constantly inquiring of His mind on every matter. When we do this, we can expect the same results that David achieved-success in our endeavor and recognition by God.
Kleenex-covered float exploded in flames and was out in about a minute flat...but the tires--no such luck. They burned and burned and burned...and the sound of fire engines came closer and closer and closer. Mr. Shedd started "coaching" us kids into his own "script" about who did what, and whose idea the whole thing was...he was trying to get one kid to take the fall for him--since the kid was not a legal age yet--get it?? Yeah. Idiot.
Shakespeared; lad insane.
Good for planning a trip involving several people, and similar things.
Could things be worse? Absolutely. Will they get so bad that this looks good by comparison? I sure hope not.
I am particularly sympathetic to any RSI sufferer as I suffered from this problem many years ago when I first became an Assistant. At the time I hadn’t even heard of RSI so wasn’t aware of the possible complications it presented. I developed a small pain in my right forearm whilst at work that stayed with me until I went home. This continued for a few days but I soldiered on, and was determined not to let it get the better of me. Anyway, I thought, who was going to do my work if I didn’t? In retrospect, this was a mistake! Over the weekend, the pain increased to a constant, sometimes very painful, ache, and began to keep me awake at night. My forearm slightly swelled and it took me several weeks of resting to reduce the swelling and truly get over the pain. I still managed to do my work, but had to type with just one hand, which is not ideal when you are the only Assistant in the department! Now when I feel the tell tale signs of RSI I rest for a while. This has kept in under control ever since.
Wan Shahinur Izmir paid the bail.
If you are in the UK, you are probably aware by now that being awarded the Olympics is apparently the equivalent of issuing some kind of giant “come at me bro” to all the terrorist organisations and deranged individuals in the world.
Merrell: The Lake Michigans! I got it right!
For example, in The Hammer, Gig creates a factory and with it, guns. This isn't new technology to the setting. It's not a new method. But no one has done it before because no one thought of it. No one took the time to do it. No one was interested in it. Everyone was interested in keeping things the exact way they were, fighting that inevitable decline of their ways as society collapsed slowly, ever so slowly about them.
Everything you need is still right there inside of you. You haven’t lost it. It is NOT too late. Plug in to the main source. Open up and check around inside. Do you need to purge some social circles? Choose fruit over cake? Devote time to your craft instead of television or social sites? Forgive? What is the issue inside of you that is hindering the progress outside of you?
THE RESULTS
That doesn't sound too hard, does it?
The prize that she is offering to the winner of this challenge is this Hannah Lynn Fragile Heart stamp.
j:I would advise aspiring models to trust their gut feelings and always keep at it. stay focussed and don't let anyone tell you you're not good enough.
Unfortunately the bureau isn't big enough to store my sewing machine in but I'm quite happy for that to stand there looking pretty in it's very own cover on top of that big wicker chest where, if you peek inside, you will find all my favourite fabrics hiding. And whilst I'm telling you about my little bargains I have to let you know that the chest there was another fabulous car boot sale find for only £8. I snapped it up and when I opened the lid I found another 2 chests hidden inside! How wonderfully happy was I? The two baby chests now live downstairs and hide away some of my yarns along with just about every other piece of furniture in that room...........
The Red Sox start in an hour....I'll be off playing basketball, so I can come back and watch around the 8th inning -- when absolutely nobody in the game will be familiar. If they're losing, I blame the post-White House visit hangover. And who hasn't had that before, right?
I have to admit it is real nice to finally have a load off with now not being one of those Undeclared people, for sum reason I thought there was a stigma of sorts with us but I don’t see the big deal. I’m a freshman so at least I’m taken more lightly then a junior who is still undeclared. While this does set me back a year from the presumed outline for my studies I’ll still be able to comfortably graduate in four years, or hell I’ll take the an extra fall term to get free student football tickets for one more season. And I admit I bet my parents are a little bit happier since the major I was looking to go into but was regected from a month ago was one of the rare 5-year majors so your welcome for saying you roughly 50k or so parents lol.
I chose to put a "hugs" sentiment because I plan to send this card to Love Letters who will pass it on to a child with a life-threatening illness. They ask that the sentiment is warm and positive instead of "get well soon". I thought this would go well with the Happy Healing theme, don't you?
Maria here with some Adorable inspiration.
One of the other popular ones is to have humans be pervasive, hardy, and numerous. This is an easy trick–humans happen to be physically hardier than other species, or reproduce faster, or what-have-you. I use a version of this myself in The Rubric of All Things, in which humans are extremely tough and disease resistant (we do take our immune system for granted, don’t we?).
According to Oberholzer, students have the right to take up the career of their choice and the purpose of this action is to lay claim to this right.
Veener’s actions press them into the Sixties to avoid him and they are swept into the Ice Limit. The book rushes to an exciting conclusion that is not at all what you think. Still, some parts dragged for me throughout the book (admittedly, I’m not a science person so—).
than a lifelong oeuvre to answer the simple question:
Bag of rocks or great northern beans
One day I finally couldn't stand it anymore
Papers- from my stash box
The second post in this series will cover background information about the actual buttons themselves. Subsequent posts will show how to make various buttonholes and fix common buttonhole errors. Til then, good knitting!
Among the evening’s best moments were the spirited renditions of "Animal Life", "You As You Were", "Open Your Houses (Basilisk)", "Immaculate" and especially "Breaking The Yearlings" and "Pushing The River" (a track which rides on the drumbeat of Joy Division’s "Heart And Soul"). Both of these songs were boosted by extra percussion, adding weight to my belief that all rock bands would sound better with two drummers! Meiburg was in fine voice throughout the set, with his soaring vocals adding extra power to his compositions.
(added- If you're in the NYC area or maybe the internet provides 98.7 Kiss-FM is running interviews, songs all from the man himself intermittently today, since of course Isaac Hayes was host on 98.7)
Chapter 10: oBay Introduction
Sometimes I wish I could seriously start parenting all over again. With the knowledge I know now. I was telling my friend this yesterday. Poor Piper, she was just an experiment. Luckily I have cleaned my act before she will have any memory of it. The sad thing is is I bet I will say this in another five years. The thing is, the more you learn and read, the more you realize how little you know. Maybe it'd be better to blindly raise children without any psychological knowledge. I have this things for parenting books. Probably because of their psychology base, which I love, psychology. Now if only I could implement what I know. In the heat of the moment, it's a little hard though. But baby steps. Keep trying, keep learning, keep implementing as best you can. Just do what you can do.
(Please Note: these toys are appropriate for 4 plus years of age)
People just need to be educated on the facts of the situations that are unfolding and have been going on for quite a few years now.
All this gets back to what I said earlier..."fundamentally alter the core of the way we live."
“Giraffe,” I tell him.
My relationship with television is just about as convoluted as Don and Betty Draper’s. I realise that it is a source of much entertainment, but I lose interest as fast as you can say ‘Peggy Olsen is a force to be reckoned with’, and move onto the next book that needs reading on my ever-expanding bookshelf.
“Go Get her!” he who must have been the captain shouted, and motioned to the hallway. The two warriors looked at each other and cautiously entered the corridor to disappear down its length. Sharia could not see the captain from where she crouched, but she heard his footsteps as he came nearer. She knew he would be able to detect her soon enough, and gripping her bone knife she prepared to pounce.
The cool thing about the beginning of the year is that we get a fresh start to make this one much better than the last one. Saying you’re going to make a ‘new month resolution’ sounds downright silly but when it comes to January 1 people are ever keen to make a new years’ resolution list.
I am sharing with you a recycle sign I made out of all recycled, reused, or up-cycled items. I made the sign for a friend to friend to hang in her classroom. She also happens to be my son's science teacher and has all the kids recycling. She has recycling bins in her classroom and I thought it would be cute to hang by the bins.
dried parsley, optional
Does everyone write?
· Division of receipts and payment of expenses (Scottish Cup)
“No person has the right to rain on your dreams.”
UTEE (Ultra Thick Embossing Enamel)
I used small tester pots which cost practically nothing, and which I had still left over from Easter egg decorating .
strive to pick up her leathery lace.
A lazy-holic is addicted to being lazy. We all know her. She is the one who procrastinates about everything, manages to get some things done but would much rather be on the couch watching the most recent episode of whatever recorded on the DVR. I masked my lazy in bursts of industry, the laundry got done, the family got fed, the house got cleaned but I was still lazy. The dogs didn’t get walked…they have a back yard after all…why do they need to get walked every day? A lazy-holic considers physical activity with reservation and resignation rather than joy and the sense of well being.
Q One thing I’ve found in researching this issue is that institutions often point to each other when setting fees. They say, “this fee is consistent with comparable institutions in the area.” So how do you expect this admissions fee change to impact structures at the AGO and the Ontario Science Centre and other museums in the area?
So here is my layout featuring a PP XL Vintage Girl Button and some funky red tickets.Not sure why the colours look a bit wierd. I played in PSE9 but still didn't get it quite right. The background looks a little green but it is actually cream...
Unlicensed 9mm guns, 402 live rounds of 9mm ammunition and 283 empty 9mm cartridges were also found.
So that's how I spent a tiny bit of my bonus. Have you bought anything beautiful lately?
I have two sons. When they were about four, they both went through a phase of having nightmares. I would go into the room and switch on the light. Two small eyes blinked at me from the corner.
4. I really don't care for small talk and the ubiquitous here in the uk "how are you", which is followed by the obligatory mindless finethanksandyou?, before one even has a chance to think. I come from a country where when somebody asks how are you, it actually means they expect a more elaborate answer. if we don't care - we don't say anything.
Friday night was alot of fun...and the fun carried over into Saturday - the 90th annual family reunion for my dad's side of the family. The reunion means some games, lots of family, and TONS of food! I was proud of myself for eating as healthy as I could, but also glad that Lydia could enjoy some summertime treats (popsicles, popsicles, and more popsicles!)
5. Confessions of A Suicide Advocate
Still bummed about Sam.
Bit of a shame it arrived today and not the weekend or I’d crack open a tin or three, but it will have to wait for the next weekend now.( as it involves driving most days, I am now teetotal Sunday to Thursday , it’s not worth the risk )
"You know. The one that sounds like a kitten."
That you love him.”
This was adapted a little for the Skeptictionary from some earlier stuff I wrote.
87) Speaking of roses, if I'm not wearing Paloma Picasso perfume, I'm wearing rose oil as a perfume. I love roses.
Again, since this is an MMO, story and characters will not be covered as they are practically irrelevant.
Tony headed towards the casino, where he took a gaming class to brush up on his table game skills, then met me for shuffleboard on the Promenade deck. It was a very interesting game. The boat's rolling made it hard to figure out where the disks were going. Shots that I aimed towards the left side of the court sometimes went true, and sometimes ended up on the right. After our match was over, I went to one of the ship's lounges where a walking art tour of some of the artwork on the ship was gathering. While I was waiting for the tour to start, a woman from my gym walked in!
Left Lash Enamal /Right Lash Expander
A drink was placed in my hand and I looked up. A mask covered in raven feathers decorated this man’s face. Nervous, I took a hearty drink and spluttered its contents onto the pale blue shirt of my new companion. The drink, not punch after all but some sort of alcohol, tasted faintly sweet, like honey.
How can something that felt so right have ended up like this? How can the man that I feel with every shred of my being was my soulmate and the one I was going to marry – no longer want a part in our formerly shared hopes and dreams? How am I ever going to rise above this and see myself as anything other than tarnished second rate goods?
1 tsp chilli powder
21th of January 2011
In reality, however, these art forms weren’t as segregated as the cultures from whence they sprang. Certainly in the case of bluegrass, the music was flavored by the blues from the outset. At the same time that the “Great Migration” was bringing thousands of black families from the southern delta into the cities of the Northeast and Midwest, many poor whites from the southern mountains were flocking to those same industrial centers, getting exposed to the blues and other musical styles along the way. Bill Monroe, the father of the genre, made a point of crediting the early influence that Arnold Shultz, an African American itinerant musician, had on his playing. His first single as a solo artist was a blues number (albeit one written by a white man), “Mule Skinner Blues” and “blue notes” play a big role in Monroe-style mandolin.
VOLUNTEERS NEEDED!
Ms. LaBombard was involved in the design of the High Line and gave us insight into how one of the most fascinating public spaces I have ever experienced, came to be.
She tells me how she spoke to my aunt and they were discussing in great detail what a mess the country is in at the moment (Argentina)…. not sure how that is news, seeing as how it's been a mess since the day she was born. Elapsed time: 17 min.
ANGELA BASSETT (Vampire in Brooklyn, Waiting to Exhale)
Please Note: I was not given monetary compensation in order to do the review and I was only sent the scarf for review purposes. All views expressed within this review post are my own. The giveaway item is provided by AffordableScarves.com and they will be sending the item directly to the winner!
Whimpsy Shapeology Dies - Bottle Cap Die
By Allison Mulimba.
The posting received quite a lively response, including a number of comments from from people who took the view that Lt. Col Lakin's case had no merit, he was either deluded, racist or a coward, that Obama had already proved he was born in the US state of Hawaii and therefore had no case to answer.
I never would have guessed!
To do that, you must understand what that editor’s problem is (from their point of view.)
ANDREW: I did not.
We had a few email exchanges so that I could get some more information before I set to work this morning in hope of producing a small capsule collection that would see Kirsty through spring and summer in the office with ease, but I also wanted to include pieces that could be worn at weekends or mix and matched with existing pieces as well. Most people are on some sort of budget so I wanted pieces that would work hard for their money.
At the center of Paul’s gospel message is Christ. Who is Christ according to Paul? What was Christ’s role in the beginning of creation? Some have argued that Jesus’ title as the “firstborn over creation” means that he was created and not equal with God. The word “firstborn” in this passage has do with Christ’s authority over creation otherwise it could not be said in verse 16 that “by him all things were created.” What is Christ’s ongoing role in creation? Who is Christ in relation to the church?
This is not a Monday Morning Blues post, as you can no doubt tell—& my apologies to the music loving readers out there. I know the Monday Morning Blues & Banjo Friday posts have been sporadic over the past month or so.
If not, what do you think would have been different if they had gone to school?
“KEY LIME PIE“
MORE FROM THIS ISSUE »
I thought you would get a kick out of a little editing trick I did on this picture.
Firstly, I present you the version 1.04 of Runic Enchantment: now you can lock runes to be only used on weapons or armors as well as create a type of “unique” rune – as, only one can be inscribed on your equipment piece.
2) Being awake for the next 24 hours.
Thank you for the offer of a $127 round flight trip from New York (to either Springdeer, Indiana or Lilybear, Wisconsin on either Christmas Day or New Year’s Eve). Thank you for that wonderful offer, but I will have to decline. I am declining because I no longer live in New York and because if I did I would have no desire to go to freckin‘ Springdeer or Lilybear!!! People from Springdeer and Lilybear go to New York to fill up the seats at Cats and to clog Times Square with pedestrian foot traffic. It does not work the other way around unless, of course, there’s some kind of death in the family. And if that was the case I’d be seeking a bereavement flight – fully paid for by the airline’s kindness and not your half-assed offer.
Maybe I’m just too old fashioned.
It’s always a great idea to have one’s team interact, work with and learn from one’s global counterparts (in short regular spurts, if not on a continual basis) as it’s a powerful learning which no seminar, e-learning or book can impart. That kind of learning will be a powerful enabler when your business tries to cut across global boundaries – think overcoming localisation issues when marketing and branding your product/ service in different markets, working with global teams efficiently, inculcating respect for diversity etc.
Odd thought for today: Do you worry about the use of ‘shall’ and ‘will’ to denote the future? The americans don’t. ‘Will’ is the norm in the States. I tend to use ‘will’ and ‘shall’ as I please…. do I need to ostracize myself.. banish myself ? .. cast myself out from social, political, or private favour / favor? (US readers only).
Betty dabbed at her eyes with a kerchief. “He’ll get over it. And your mama is gonna secretly be cheering you on. It’ll be hard on them, but this’ll be the best thing for all of you.” She sighed heavily. “Especially you, Evie. Especially you. Trust me.”
I’ve played out all sorts of fantasies in my head — an out of town area code shows up on the caller I.D. and “Maybe it’s the lab calling to clear up a terrible error that was made with the amnio results!!”, “Maybe the vials were mixed up!”, “Maybe the person reading the results was new and inexperienced!”, etc., etc. The amnio results are said to be 99% accurate. It’s not so much that 1% shred of hope, or a possible error that I’m hanging onto, but rather God’s infinite power. Our God that created an entire universe has the power to cure a tiny baby with an extra chromosome.
I came to it needing/wanting to lean up, and shed the last bloody five pounds from my last pregnancy. I had been trimming excess and refined carbs, and working out consistently for a few months, but not seeing any positive movement on the scale, or in the fit of my clothes.
night, Princess Merrnich said that she was "rendered speechless by this miracle of beauty: wonderful hair, the waist of a nymph, and a complexion the color of pink marble! In a word, Venus descended from Olympus. Never have I seen beauty to rival hers, not shall I see her like again.”
Some scriptures that come to mind:
Perhaps they don't know; but Angels could have sworn that the concept of jettatore is carried, is profoundly understood, in Arab cultures.
Changed Transformer to Cinemag CM-2480
When the office moved out last year the amount of cupboardage in the kitchen seemed excessive so I removed everything above waist height and proved that law about rubbish expansion in the presence of storage space - just how many colanders do we need, how many times have we used those funny knives, what exactly were we planning to do with all those plastic carrier bags? Why do we have a drawer/drawers for things that we don't know what to do with?
“If only owning a gun was my right”
It was a beautiful day so we spent the morning in Lahaina. We began with breakfast at Cheeseburger in Paradise. We sat upstairs next to a window with its great views of Lanai in the distance. I had the eggs benedict with hash browns and Tony had a burger with hash browns and a fried egg on top. Everything was tasty and service was good.
A mom that fails a lot to be honest as I know most of you do, but just wanted you to know you're not alone. This morning was rough.. you know one of those mornings you wish you could go back and do it all over again? One of those mornings that you feel like you're never going to get everything done. Here's a taste of a typical rough morning for this momma just so you can get a taste. ... Kate wakes up early (6am) her nose still running non stop and a bad bad cough after two weeks but Dr. swears it's just a cold. I try to lay her in my bed to catch that extra 20 minutes of sleep but she is pulling my hair so hard and playing with my lips and eyelashes. Finally I get bugged enough to get up to start the day. I tell myself ok good I can get a head start on things .. I make breakfast and get it all laid out ready to eat. I move on to start lunches while Jonas and Parker now start their breakfast, meanwhile motor mouth (Jonas) is talking non stop way to chipper for any of us in the morning. Then you have Brooke not wanting to get up at all... total bad mood. I make a bottle for Kate then fix her food. I feel ahead of schedule and tell the kids I just need to write one 5 minute email to someone .. this is when it all goes downhill... the noise is now getting louder Parker wanted more food but now doesn't want it, so I told him he needed to finish it. Then Jonas kept bugging Parker.. they are bickering. I'm at the computer desk .. about every few minutes someone can't find something "my socks are too small and the other one had a hole in it" comes from around the corner. I think to myself " ugg I need to do laundry again?" "I don't want the rest of my food" says someone else. Then it's stress out time because today was crazy hair day at school ... go get me a bunch of your bows and we'll make it cute she's ok with that then comes back melt down"I don't want to do it?" I say I don't care you don't have to do it! Then realized I forgot to finished the lunches, oh no I don't have much... I think "didn't I just go to the store a few days ago?" I have blueberry muffins, some ham roll ups and stale pretzels with a box of raisins .. that will have to do. Then Lucky our dog keeps running into me crying to be let out which I kept forgetting while looking for matching socks. I let him out then he chases a squirrel, he almost catches him, I gasp and move him on. Then I come in distracted thinking I would love to have a cup of coffee but really not enough time to make a new batch so I reheated coffee from yesterday ( I know gross) but I needed my addiction fix of caffeine in the morning. I can only take two sips until I want to spit it out all over the place. Gross I think! I go to return to my computer to send my email. Kate is fussy wanting to be held.. I hold her for a sec to find out she has poop then get her ready for the day, the kids are pulling out toys, Jonas needs to go potty I'm distracted again... I write a few more words then I think "ok, I will get Jonas completely ready for school then try to finish my email" Then I return the living room... it is trashed! Toys out everywhere I tell the twins to clean it up were leaving ... I get a typical "when are we leaving" from the twins? Soon right after I finish this" I say. I'm trying to remain calm, but getting annoyed as I can't type one quick email. I sit down to type a few words then Jonas walks over with his mouth full of bubblicious gum including the wrapper. I said " Where did you get that?" Diaper bag .... I say spit it out Jonas and he then of course swallows it. He's not supposed to have gum because he chokes on it. He is in trouble! I put him in time out. He's screaming crying... meanwhile Kate is still fussy because she wants someone to hold her. I think to myself I just wanted to write one quick email, that is it! I tell the twins for the hundredth time get your shoes on... NOW! I start the continuous nagging a mother does so well! Then I finish my 3 line email a MIRACLE and tell the kids to get their book bags. We head to the car, Jonas of course doesn't get in the car and hops on his bike in the garage while I'm putting Kate in. I grab the trash out of the car thinking oh wow I actually have time today to wash my van... so I grab Parker's jacket on the floor... he's screaming I need my jacket. No you don't it, it's 90 degrees today.. he says he likes to use it at school . I said Parker you have two days left at school.. you don't need it. Oh no here it goes, total melt down... he's so upset crying pouting and once he starts he doesn't stop and this point I had had it, I grab the jacket and threw it at him and told him he was a baby! Yes, that's right I told my kid he's acting like a baby! I know as soon as the words left my mouth I was totally wrong.. I don't think I have ever said something so nasty! All patience when out the door and I yelled at them on the way to school ..
5/22 @ Cervantes – Denver, CO
What’s good about Queen of Teen? It recognises the body of work of a writer, not just one book. It gives a chance for writers of books with girls as main characters to be celebrated by the girl readers themselves. Its first two winners were Louise Rennison and Cathy Cassidy, both wonderful authors whose books can be enjoyed by all ages and all genders.
Now I’ll have to be honest and say I don’t see the need to distinguish between constitutive and causal luck. They seem like very similar concepts to me. Nevertheless, I think there is some utility to the resultant/circumstantial distinction. Indeed, within the criminal law — which is where the issue of attempt liability arises — this distinction is significant. This is because crimes are typically distinguished from one another on these kinds of grounds. For example, murder is a result-oriented offence: the actus reus of murder is the death of one person as caused by actions of another. In contrast, rape is a conduct and circumstances-oriented offence: the actus reus of rape is (usually) penetration of a bodily orifice of one person by the penis of another (conduct), without the consent of the person being penetrated (circumstance). So the conceptual and normative issues associated with resultant and circumstantial luck could be important when assessing attempt liability.
In the first decade of this century we came closer to being replaced within out homeland than we ever have before.
Stayed tuned for more adventures with the Daggs, something exciting might just happen.
And as you see, I`ve got my brand NEW spellbinders dies!! Oh boy, do I ever love those lacey dies! They are actually square shaped, but I made them a bit longer to fit the image.
Artist of the Month
EDIT: Ward Mundy reports that he just may have found a workaround for the incoming calls issue — see this thread in the PBX in a Flash forum.
love from afar
This won't be a typical trade post. My scanner is down, so I wont be able to share all the cards I have recently received in trades. Like many collectors, I have cut back on my spending recently and only bought a small amount of Topps series one, especially when comparing it to last year. If Topps releases new value boxes this year that might change. Meanwhile I have been focusing on finishing some of my set projects, specifically 87', 88' and 89' Topps and 2011 Topps Kimball Minis and Heritage. Some card shop purchases have helped, but mostly generous trades have helped me nearly complete these sets. A quick thanks goes out to:
you take each other
After losing political power, Oppenheimer used his position to lecture and publish articles on science and his views on atomic energy into the sixties. He died of cancer on February 18, 1967.
If you think race plays a part in anything, you are doing 2 things. One you are holding yourself back by making up excuses for failure because you are listening to bigots and racists. Second you are holding great people back all because they do not fall into your stereotype of who should run a business, country or race the next race. Open up your mind and grow as a person. If people get past this way of thinking then more people of all races will end up running corporations, teams, and playing all kinds of sports or running races or inventing new products or ideas.
Now, returning to our text in Acts 27:16. “We had much work to come by the boat.” First, let’s consider the word “we”. This included the writer, Luke and without doubt, Paul. Everyone, passenger, prisoner, sailor and captain was involved in the attempt of saving the ship and, of course, their lives.
Secondly, if the low-cost properties are so collateral-worthy, that the market price is much higher than the purchase price, then why can’t these loans be made via commercial banks and not through EPF social lending programmes? If DBKL is able to provide the guarantee, and the guarantee is even “better than normal corporate property”, then surely, banks will be rushing to provide the loans and not shy away from them.
There are probably a couple of ways of coming at this text. The first would be to just read it. It would not hurt, and it might be quite instructive, to read Philosophical Fragments first. The Postscript is just that…a Postscript to the Philosophical Fragments (a really long, and “Concluding Unscientific” postscript.) Kierkegaard would be pleased if he knew he found a solitary reader that would take this text as something to be grappled with in and off itself. And in many respects, it is just that. That being said, Kierkegaard deliberately obfuscates things by writing this text under the pseudonym Johannes Climacus. In doing so, he feels he has given himself freedom to say that the contents of the Postscript are not necessarily the beliefs of Kierkegaard himself (but rather they are those of Johannes Climacus). Knowing this, while reading the text, leaves one constantly wondering where Kierkegaard comes down in relation to the ideas put forth by Climacus. Hence, a second, although perhaps less rewarding, way of reading the text is possible. Read Kierkegaard’s The Point of View for my Work as an Author before you read this. Why? This is by no means the only pseudonymous work of Kierkegaard. His has many pseudonymous texts with multiple pseudonyms. Not all of his works are pseudonymous. There are some signed works that he is willing to affirm, it would seem, are expressive of his own ideas. The signed works deal more explicitly with some of Kierkegaard’s theological concerns. Why does Kierkegaard write two different kinds of texts? In the Point of View for My Work as an author, he seems to be saying the following.(****and if you don’t like plot spoilers, stop reading****) “Ok guys, here what I’ve been up to all this time. In short…I’m frustrated with my contemporaries. They treat Luther’s notion of justification by grace alone through faith alone as something easy to understand; furthermore, it seems like the doctrine itself is making them passive about the Christian faith (when it should actually make them more active). My desire is that they not cheapen the doctrine in such a way. Furthermore, my desire is that they feel a new awe and passion…and desire to live out the Gospel because of this doctrine. Because they are so hard headed, or asleep, I can’t just approach them directly about this. I have to indirectly communicate with them. That is…I almost have to lure…if not deceive them into thinking they are entering a discussion about one thing, when in reality the discussion is about the aforementioned. Hence, my use of pseudonyms who discuss a wide range of topics from a variety of vantage points. Furthermore, while I’ve been releasing the pseudonymous works year after year, I’ve also been releasing my signed works, where I communicate more directly. My hope is that the one-two punch of the signed and pseudonymous texts may help my fellow Danes, whom I love deeply, take their faith and the works of love it should be producing seriously again.” To sum up Kierkegaard’s Point of View for My Work as an Author in such a way doesn’t feel quite right. It feels downright wrong. That being said, the aforementioned is basically what he is saying in The Point of View. If you know this going into a reading of the Concluding Unscientific Postscript, then you clearly read the Postscript differently (like you know a secret) and with what Kierkegaard fears will be with less passion. He published the Point of View for a reason, however, and it is fitting, in a review of the Postscript, to make reference to the Point of View. Simply put (and there really isn’t anything simple about the Postscript), the text indirectly deals with the theological issues that Kierkegaard himself feels extremely passionate about. As I wind down this review, I feel like I’ve cheapened Kierkegaard’s efforts. I should stress that none of what has been said to this point should cause any prospective reader to be dismissive of this text or any of the other pseudonymous works. Kierkegaard is one of the forerunners of post-modernity and he’s generally considered to be the father of modern existentialism. He’s a major player in what is going on in our world of ideas right now (as is Nietzsche). Understating exactly why these things are so will take a level of grappling with the entire Kierkegaardian authorship (and works like the Postscript) that would please Kierkegaard. If one is a student of philosophy, theology, a/theology, post-modernity, existentialism, or life (for that matter) this is a monumental text. It’s a challenging read, but more than worth the challenge. A mentor of mine once told me: “Read the Concluding Unscientific Postscript to the Philosophical Fragments” and then go back and read the Gospel of John. You’ll never be the same.” I had no clue what he meant…not before I read the text…and not for a second while I was beating my head against the wall reading The Postscript. I did it anyway. My mentor was right.
Booooo!
This past season, he took the starting job from Kyle Orton at halftime of the Week 5 game vs the Chargers and nearly led the 1-3 Broncos to victory.
“Here is the first part of the medical supplies. When you administer some of these drugs be very careful and read the instructions, several times if need be. I will give the rest of the medical supplies to you including the broad spectrum antibiotics when our last vehicle is through.”
15) Roll out the pastry into a long rectangle.
she tells how she made it and where she got the template from.
Here’s how I described the book to some Romance writers:
to catch...
There will be a Missa Cantata sung by the excellent schola that grew in voice and stature after 14th September 2007 and I have no doubt that the faithful band of brothers and sisters, the lay members of the Confraternity of the Holy Cross and members of the LMS will turn out in honour of Our Lady of the Taper.
Sentiment: Whiff of Joy winter kit 2011
If you're bored writing something, people will be bored reading it.
West leads the way in one-liners and blood splatter as he perfects his new serum. The brightly colored liquid eventually brings back the one person who wants to steal both West’s drug and Cain’s girlfriend.
15.) Guns & Roses - Welcome To The Jungle - I hate to put this on because Axl is such an ass, but this is more about Slash.
“One day as he was teaching, Pharisees and teachers of the law, who had come from every village of Galilee and from Judea and Jerusalem, were sitting there. And the power of the Lord was present for him to heal the sick. 18Some men came carrying a paralytic on a mat and tried to take him into the house to lay him before Jesus. 19When they could not find a way to do this because of the crowd, they went up on the roof and lowered him on his mat through the tiles into the middle of the crowd, right in front of Jesus.
In August, Mr. DePlasco said, two months after the agreement was signed, Forest City disbursed $100,000 to the group. The company also provided space for and is paying the overhead of a new Build office near the Atlantic Yards site, and along with other supporters donated furniture and computer equipment to the group. On Sept. 5, Ms. Duncan said, Build began paying several staff members, including Mr. Caldwell and Ms. Louis, who she said are currently being paid at a rate equal to half the salaries listed on the group's original I.R.S. form. Before the signing of the community-benefits agreement, the staff had been working as volunteers, she said.
Okay, so the onions weren't from the farmers market, but the garlic and peppers are! (Do you see that crazy red pepper in the front middle?) I love the way sofrito flavors things so I decided to make a bunch and can it. I was clearly out of my mind. I ended up buying about twice as much of everything that I meant to. That happens when everything is so fresh and awesome, sometimes. Well, that just means I'll have sofrito for quite a while.
I'm pretty sure I'm making a quilt. I haven't decided what colors or if I want to use scraps or cut new fabric, but I have time to decide. I'm only 5 miles into my trip across the US. I have a LONG way to go.
Her catheter was taken out today and she was given 8 hours to get up and pee. I know, for a fact, that she waited as long as she did because of the pain associated with getting out of bed. When she finally couldn't hold it anymore, she called for assistance and, of course, a male pca came in. My modest daughter looked at me wide eyed and with regret for even calling out for help. Needless to say, she had to pee that bad. Luckily, after the nausea and the feeling that she was going to pass out, we made it to the bathroom without the aide seeing her butt, and after sitting for 15minutes, she was successful.
Here I am again playing with toys! OK, making them first! But gee, Mrs Fox is pretty cute I think. I decided the boys aren't getting this one. This one is mine. They can play with it but it's mine. I will share with them. Major lessons in sharing this will be! I started Foxy the other day & have worked on it in bits & pieces, over the last few days. I actually wanted it done last night but had to stop & get to bed. So this morning I have done it's tail! Yep, 7am crochet! Lovely quiet time. When the boys are up it will be crazy once more & things like this don't quite get the focus they need to mistakes occur in counting! It is very important to do a lot of counting in amigurumi work. Other wise they turn out funny shapes! Yes I know this to be true. No point doing a pattern if you aren't going to do the pattern! Mostly I say patterns are just suggestions. But if there is a particular shaped toy you are after it pays to follow the pattern! lol
Just me and my Elements!
So what do you think?! Leave a comment to sum up your feelings on this project! What benefits have you found! What is your giant printable wish list for me? What do your family members think of all this Household Binder stuff?
WHAT: Join Austin-based microbrewery NXNW for their annual St. Patrick’s Day celebration. With green-tinted craft beer, lively music and authentic cuisine, the luck of the Irish will be in the air.
Tex-Mex Squash Casserole
My mother said that her colleagues were usually quite circumspect about their personal lives, but when you worked with the same people year after year, little snippets of information gradually built up into a whole picture.
And just as I was starting to think the kitchen looked great retro daddy reminded me we still have to buy a microwave and put it somewhere. Uh oh. He said just put your thermomix away and put a microwave there but the reality is that I use my thermomix a whole lot more. Might need a trip to Ikea to find some sort of kitchen bench thingy.
Don’t be intimidated in your dealings with people or businesses that you perceive to be larger than you can handle. Persistence and tenacity are vital to making good impressions with this type of buyer but they are still humans after all. They are still susceptible to everything we are covering in this book and often appreciate it when someone deals with them straight up. They have been used to people staying out of their way because of their status so it is refreshing when someone challenges them. As long as your approach is sincere and in their best interest you can get them to listen and build a relationship with them. It may take longer than some but they are also extremely rewarding. Whether it is a large account or the girl of your dreams you should know that building that relationship is never out of your reach.
There are many misconceptions about design. Magazines often use the word design when they mean style or fashion. For example, when they show a toaster or bottle opener which is well designed, the result is that people think that design is all about how things look. Design is also about how things work. In reality, the way how a product looks is something that (usually) happens at the end of development process.
It's a total win.
Long overdue
A major miracle, but we left the house in good time with no baby or adult meltdowns. On Fifth Avenue, when I could see the runners zooming by on Fourth, my heart pounded. They were right there, so many of them zipping by. And the noise from the crowd booming. How had we not done this before? We picked up Annie, made it to the frontlines, and started cheering everyone. Helen was stunned, Mason clapped and I, as if to make up for the past twenty races, I tried to high-five as many runners as possible. Brooklyn at its very very best.
Another first grade teacher received this card on Valentine's Day. Just for some background, she is not married. She received this card from one of her students. He was quite excited to give it to her and bugged her all day about opening the card, but as it was both Valentine's Day and the 100th Day of School, she was a bit busy and did not manage to do so until after school. I'm sure it will be a card she cherishes for many years.
“Elbert and Alice Hubbard’s Great Work: The Influence of the Rosicrucians on the Roycrofters and the Modern Arts and Crafts Movement” (Co-Author and Co-Presenter: Hugh McCague, Ph.D.) The presentation will illustrate the influence that the Rosicrucian Tradition and other Esoteric Traditions had on Elbert and Alice Hubbard, progressive philosophers and leaders of the influential Roycroft Arts and Crafts movement of East Aurora, New York. H. Spencer Lewis, chief executive officer and Imperator of the Rosicrucian Order, AMORC indicated that the Hubbards worked with him on the first American Council to reactivate the outer expression of the Order in the Americas in 1915. Notable connections and concurrences of the Roycroft and the Rosicrucians can still be made. The presentation discusses the literary and artistic evidence, the effect that esotericism and Rosicrucianism had on the Hubbards, the expression of this influence through the Roycroft, and its subsequent impact on the wider Arts and Crafts movement and society can be inferred. The literary evidence includes the writings and lectures of Elbert and Alice Hubbard which are replete with profound points of agreement with the Rosicrucian philosophy. The artistic evidence includes the designs, craftwork and iconography of the Roycroft and its campus have many special allusions that closely match Rosicrucian symbolism, laws and principles. Some of these correspondences include the recurrent rose motif in the Roycroft Inn’s windows and Roycroft publications, the aphorisms inscribed on the Roycroft Inn’s portals, and Elbert’s appellation and magazine title The Fra. In addition to the Roycroft movement that was active until 1938, the Roycroft Renaissance movement has been underway since 1960. Since 1976, the Roycroft has been the only Arts and Crafts center to have been regenerated by a new guild and colony of artisans, the Roycrofters-at-Large Association (RALA) Artisans. Part of this renaissance has been the on-going contact with, and influence of, the Rosicrucian Order, AMORC. In this manner, the Rosicrucian philosophy and inspiration has been subtly suggested and effectively expressed as “Hidden in Plain Sight” for over a century in the Roycroft and Roycroft Renaissance.
The yarrow, which I cannot keep from the super flop, is also going to Virginia, as soon as things thaw up there, where it can be planted in the 'ignored' bed, and just be a field flower.
Talk about one-trick-ponies, French Films was the main attraction yesterday. After the stellar Golden Sea EP (2010), the boys released a much-awaited, albeit mediocre debut album, Imaginary Future last year.
* I’m housesitting this weekend for a friend of mine who has a litter of puppies she needs to have someone keep an eye on. I am making the supreme sacrifice to help her out, because I'm just a wonderfully caring friend. Did I mention that she has a gorgeous in-ground pool with a Tiki bar and outdoor fireplace? I know, I know. I’m just a giver.
I would love to write more about it but I will spare myself for the ones who have not seen the movie yet as it will destroy all the fun. So readers please do watch this movie. I know, most people’s first impression of the movie is that it will be too intellectual because it’s silent and it’s in black and white. Believe me, that’s not the case. it’s a lot of fun. It’s full of fun and surprises and you will feel good and refreshed in the end .Watch it.
With sixty seconds' worth of distance run,
So, I challenge all young people: Take initiative! Don't worry about any labels. Initiative, coupled with perseverance will take you further than superior intelligence. Intelligence is a bonus.
it is 1959 and I go get a shoeshine
A big failure was my attempt at book binding. It works for me and what I wanted but it isn't pretty, so no directions on this part. :) The good news is I did remember this time to leave room for binding so that's a positive!
“You are fat, stupid and ugly.” This is just one example of the taunting that some students endure from peers and classmates. These and other harmful statements are instances of bullying.
Shown from left: Dark Brown, Pink-Brown and Navy styles.
So breaking down his argument, this stems back to when children have to take their books around with them (and home) and the end of each day, in case of theft. So we are talking about after school hours, in evenings, at night ? In essence his claim is that the fault is that teachers failed to protect schools after school from thefts and break ins. Is that a teacher's role ? If so, what an utterly ridiculous argument.
Northern Lights by Nora Roberts
This imputed righteousness comes from a built-up account of righteousness earned and bought by the only One Who could have earned it. Such righteousness is as glorious to a fallen sinner as any treasure to be found in His riches in glory. (Ephesians 1:18)
Master Brew - (Bitter) 4.0% ABV
Thought of the day: "What would you do if you found out your mom was the famous Buriteri?"
statutes and made us into corporate fictions so you could create
Did you know that the female egg or ovum is one of the largest cells in the body and can just about be seen by the naked eye? Interestingly, sperm is the smallest cell in the male body.
Narcissists give off a lot of energy. They are exciting to be around. They seem to know what’s going on with everyone, they are very plugged in and people want to share information with them. Even if they aren’t headed towards the top, they appear that way.
Hola Bellas!!!
Pour into prepared cupcake papers and bake in preheated oven for about 20 mins, or until a toothpick comes out clean.
M Thailand
09. Good News (02:26)
This image is called "mailed my heart" and she is a freebie from Whimsie Doodles. You can find her here.
Thanks for hanging in there with us!
I still can’t quite decide whether it’s easier to check them through google reader, or as RSS feeds in my home page.
As a parent, dying is no longer an option.
I embossed a the white layer using my dotted swiss (ef). I zig zag stitched the panels in place. To finish the card off I add little drops of hot glue to the centers of the flowers. When I first put the glue on there were those annoying little strings and the drops of glue had points at the top. I took my heat gun and hit them with a quick blast of hot air and the strings dissapeared and the tops became really smooth and round. I then took a marker and added some brown color to the glue. Below is a close up view.
Since the school had no air-conditioning, the windows were left open when the weather warranted…and that was often.
Have you got any favourite apps? Share them here so I can update my gadgets.
One of his many talents and interests is gardening, indoors and out. Well, not just gardening, but plant life in general. A walk in the woods with him is always an adventure since he can identify most of what it is we’re walking on, or walking past, or what lies up ahead.
I haven't written regularly on this blog for quite some time so I haven't really kept up with the kitty stories on here. Tragic, I know.
When I think of March,
Because in the last 12 yrs that I have had to deal with my pain issues I've encountered many people who think that having pain (as in 24 hrs/day) should not be a problem that you cannot handle.
And finally... my WTF moment.
“I’ve had so many people tell me how frustrating it is to try and find out where to eat, drink or shop here, especially if they’re from out of town,” said Phil Wojcik, Delaware 302’s owner “They don’t want to spend all their time visiting multiple websites for information. We’re very excited to provide people with this tool so they can search through one comprehensive listing of information for what they want and need, and get on with their vacations.”
“If he sins against you seven times in one day, and each time he comes to you saying, “I repent” you must forgive him.”
A mix of different size pots, plants, some alive, some dead and some much too big .
WHERE: Leh and surrounding villages, Ladakh region, Northern India
glory and excellence, by the power of The Holy Spirit. Amen!
Mac couldn't hide his surprise.
I keep finding good reasons not to vote for Ken Livingstone, I've yet to find one to push me the other way; I wonder why?
The nice people at Tiny Prints are offering the chance to win the grand prize of $1,000 cash, plus a $500 Tiny Prints gift certificate! Sweet, right? And just in time for the holidays :)
The need for a low cost MBA is both obvious and less so. In the obvious camp, there are highly populous nations that need to put vast numbers of workers through MBA programs to become their emerging business leaders. These are people who would be fighting for the privilege of getting an 80 thousand dollar MBA if they were in the United States or Europe.
I sit here every day and catch up with my world.
I mean, me personally, even if I didn't like the guy, I think the election of Barack Obama was one of the greatest moments of evident growth in our nation's history. I know it's sort of like the back-side of Godwin's Law by bringing up Martin Luther King while discussing racism, but seriously... If you can't see progress in the fact that 40 years after the iconic figure of the civil rights movement was murdered in an act of overt racism a black man was elected PRESIDENT.. I mean... COME ON PEOPLE. How can that be Un-American? We should all be embarrassed that South Africa beat us to it.
A4 S.O.D* - BSS
Thank you for taking the time out to read.
P-Maybe Washington Phillips. Unfortunitly he is dead now, but he was an amazing folk/ blues musician.
and the boy was put straight to bed.
I put the huge box out right before lighting candles. Erin just wanted to open her big present even though she had no clue what was inside. I think the Wii went over really well.
THIS WEEK’S PLAN: Feb 20-26
No one else but Jack bore witness to memories stepping out from the locked closet toward the window, Death wearing Greta's face dried like a husk left to the sun, lips once worth killing to kiss pulled thin past receded gums. Her eyes sunken and vastly hallow were thankfully obscured by the long batches of mud caked hair but even without her precious greens to stare into, Mattie could see all of her years of regret reflected in the cruel monstrosities face. Pain lives long after death as Mattie began to realize, the years of decay were etched into Greta’s face, the story of regret and loss written by Mattie's cowardice was taking a Greyhound road trip to the end of the story.
2 nd place = $10.00 gc
No bridges, bells that jangle,
7. Jacksonville Jaguars WR Robert Blackmon (Ok.St.) Quick name the two starting receivers for the Jags. If your lucky you might remember the name Mike Thomas. But if you didn’t Blaine Gabbert wants you to remember his new favorite target for next year. Creating some excitement in Jacksonville is what they need since the last 5 years they were one team that was always speculated to move to LA.
I left off with our plans for last Sunday. We just did walk/trot stretchy dressage work on Sunday. That was day 4 in a row of our first we back in work so I think that was fair. We worked on long and low, 20m circles, 15m circles, transitions, halts, and serpentines. I worked on really getting her connected from inside leg to outside rein. She gave me her best effort and her full attention.
“Ain’t Too Proud To Beg” was sung by Joshua with near perfection. He was the closest to being a throwback from the 60s era.
Brown will not win the Supercity unless the working class fighters in the Labour ranks, in particular the unions, take over the campaign and rally these working class stalwarts behind a fighting campaign for democracy and public ownership and control of Auckland assets.
Grouping us with transvestites and fetishists is assault and sexual objectification.
Above: Photos I took at the pumpkin festival hosted by my brother's college.
Getting from London to Evere was a piece of cake by comparison.
Here are some of the plants much loved by butterflies:-
Turquoise boards with Gilt titling to the Spine.
A male friend was once put on the spot by a group of girls who were asking him questions about which girls he found more attractive – the long-haired ones or the pixie-haired ones. He told them that he found long-haired girls to be more feminine because the long hair showed him how different the girl was from him – a guy who preferred to keep his hair close to his scalp. On the other hand, he also said that what he liked most about pixie-haired girls was that he could see their pretty faces without them hiding behind long hair. That last one, I’m not sure if it’s complete bullshit but, at that time, it sounded so freaking good to female ears. His point though? To each his own; whatever floats his woman’s boat. This is one guy who knows better than to come between a woman… and her hair.
Splits - 9:46, 10:49, 11:37, 9:29, 10:06
So much for slowly increasing the landscaping year by year. As we say around here, go big or go home – right after you go to the nursery and haggle for a volume discount.
appearance
Over the course of the afternoon, we drank two bottles of wine, a million little bits of sushi, some lemon cheese cake, some pizza, some olives, some open sandwiches and stuffed pepper things.
So I am dying to know who does Sookie end up with? Eric? Sam? Bill? Personally I think she might end up with Sam after all... any thoughts on this? If so please mark spoilers for those who might not have read this book yet!
When I got home Geekygirl tore into the swag bag. She loves this soft cotton jersey sun dress that was inspired by a piece of Mexican pottery.
Malika Zarrar: Yes. I am addressing the Saudi king. What is this? The authority for prevention of Vice only knows how to catch girls without veils. Where are they now?! They should send me to Saudi Arabia.
How about a set of Blendable Templates? Each one has a large mask and clusters. You can use the mask to blend a photo into your background paper, or blend several papers together by clipping one to the mask. There are smaller squares in the clusters to use for additional photos. They're available in all my stores:
There’s also a letter that Leonard Jerome wrote to the State Department from Trieste on May 1, 1852, in which he mentions his wife “and child,” not children (remember Jennie was the second daughter). The manifest of passengers on the Baltic, the ship the family took back to New York in 1853 lists only 2-year-old Clara with her parents. Randolph Churchill’s biography of his father adds the additional evidence of a christening mug existing in the family that was engraved “Jennie Jerome 1854.”
I'm a sucker for labels. I keep my favorites (that St. Somewhere Saison bottle is still on the kitchen windowsill). While Tumbler doesn't live up to sill-worthiness, it is a very pretty label. Lovely fall colors, a scene right out of New England--or some other fairytale place where the leaves actually change color and the air turns cool and crisp.
Why didn't I tell you then? I was too proud. I was scared. Terrified for my daughter. I couldn't think about the money we didn't have. I seriously would have dropped my bundle. And I couldn't afford to do that.
Try hard to remain calm when you are not happy with how something went. Try hard not to reply to anyone while you are angry, but wait until you have calmed yourself down, then finish the conversation with a person. Waiting even for a minute will make a difference.
8:30 am Arrived at work and found my new office (we moved offices when I was out). It felt like the first day of school where you have to find your new home room. I had no idea where I was going or what I was walking into. First on the agenda was finding where the restrooms and coffee were!
A year after they were married, the couple went to a play at Madison Square Garden. Harry spied Stanford in the crowd and freaked out. He went up to the middle-aged man and shot him three times, screaming he was getting revenge for Evelyn's sake. Horrified audience members trampled to the nearest exits.
The journey of a thousand miles begins with just one step. We must, in Rochester, take that first step by exerting our Constitutional right to vote into being, a new system of education for our children.
To fill in a few more details: After the eviction, a temporary restraining order was issued by Judge Lucy Billings holding that OWS must be allowed back into Zuccotti pending the results of a hearing to be held later in the day. This order was issued at 6:30AM and, one source says, was served on Mayor Bloomberg by 7:50AM. The protesters returned to the park to re-occupy the park, but police had blockaded it off and refused to let them in notwithstanding the court order. For reasons as yet unclear, prior to the scheduled hearing, the case was transferred to Judge Michael Stallman. That judge held in favor of the City at approximately 4:30PM.
John Lee Hooker: Odds Against Me
I spent the day today with one of my best friends, had lunch and went antiquing and poking around a boutique. We started whispering about the crafty things we saw and how we would remake them in "our style." We always do that. We're cut from the same cloth. It's like we can see the wheels go in each others heads. We have such big plans, but it's like since I'm a gypsy now, we don't follow through with our ideas.
Honestly, I am so excited for “Brave.” As you’ve probably heard, the animated film coming out this summer will star Pixar’s first ever (FIRST EVER!!) female protagonist. I also suspect that the movie is based on the book Brave Margaret which I love. But I had to laugh when I saw this by Claire Hummel/ Shoomlah on the blog Animation Anomaly.
Speaking of food and chewing, etc., it is interesting to add that she STILL doesn't have a single tooth in her mouth! LOL...oh well.
According to the 2005 Sasson Report, the outpost is located 1.8 kilometers outside of the settlement. According to the report it was erected in 2001 without the necessary permits, but with NIS 150,000 from the Ministry of Construction and Housing.So the Ministry of Construction helps build the community and then Defense Minister Ehud Barak sends in the troops to destroy the home at 4 AM.
5. If you have the problem of not being able to “visualize”, then use a pen and paper, and write it down, or a recorder and speak it out loud. Looking at a picture, like the rose in this article, and imagining touching it, smelling it, and looking at it in “real life”, also helps. So, get a picture of what you want to manifest and use it in your daydream.
Two years after moving in, things changed. We learned that we could acquire 2 young highland cattle – actually own them and have them on our property every day! That was the beginning of ramping up our farming experiences. We brought home a young highland heifer and a bull calf; it was hard to know who was more frightened of the other, us of them or them of us. This led in quick order to fencing a larger space for them than the one we had started with, since Jeremy and Jenny ate all the grass in our initial “pasture” in a week. By now we knew what hay was, and we had to do the haying ourselves to feed our growing herd. The following spring, we had a significant population increase in the first week of May: Jenny had her first calf, we acquired two piglets and 25 baby chicks to raise for meat, and at the end of the week, we had our second son. A memorable week indeed.
Christian Troy: I counted each contraction. Three times. Or were you doing your Kegel exercises?
Humiliated and desperate, she flees the glitter of Manhattan and retreats to the time warp of her parents’ Maryland home. As her sister plans her lavish wedding to her prince charming, Lindsey struggles to maintain her identity as the smart, responsible twin, while she furtively tries to put her career back together. But things get more complicated when a long-held family secret is unleashed that forces both sisters to reconsider who they are and who they are meant to be.
On the other hand, maybe I’m just biased that I’ve been following the game since day one, and, like with TOR, have nothing to show for it.
Thanks for stopping by and have a great day!
53. Tower of Evil
of how I feel about the surprise Birthday Dinner!
DURBAN: One armed attacker shot dead by security firm.
After three chapters, Chittum’s writing sobered me, but I still wasn’t convinced until he offered concrete numbers. "In California in 1993, 665,229 firearms were sold. That’s 1,873 per day. Enough firearms were sold to equip an infantry battalion." For the Californians remaining, there’s a lot of frightened people readying themselves for conflict.
Ichiro's Malt Seven of Diamonds 1991 19YO Pedro Ximenez Sherry Cask Finished. 54.8 per cent alcohol (abv).
After he had finished berating the snoozy kid, Mr. Swartz reached down to retrieve his yardstick, and came up empty-handed.
After you set up an account, you can get your own Share the Love link and you get love points for each person you refer. Love points can be used for more free polish. It's a win-win for everyone!
On a different note, the iPod is another product from Apple Inc. It is a portable device that stores and plays music and video or other forms of digital media files. It was originally released in 2001 and was developed into many variations, such as iPod classic, nano, shuffle and touch. Changes in the product model, also led to the creation of iPod accessories. Items such as stickers, transparent screen protectors, colourful pouches carry socks are just of its well-loved pieces.
During the month I did manage to finish my Autumn cat for the MS Lovers Blog SAL #3, a kitty card and the MS Lovers Blog Spring Exchange piece, as well as start another Margaret Sherry design. So quite a good stitching month for March.
3 Idiots is one of those sentimental, positive-messaged stories that may not appeal to everyone, but for a sap like me it really hit home. I don't want it to sound already like a sappy movie, because it is not, but you aren't getting anything hard nosed here at all.
1 ½ tbsp. minced garlic – they sell jars of ready-to-use minced garlic at the supermarket
How the heck am I supposed to stay motivated with that staring at my face at O Dark Thirty? Danger. Chlorine. Hey wait, I'm about to jump into a freakin' pool loaded with this stuff. I've been reading a lot of Greek Mythology (OK OK the Percy Jackson series) and the Gods are always throwing out signs to the heroes. Is this a sign? Is swimming dangerous? Will a freakin' minotaur be sitting poolside when I try to get out? Or will a half man half shark beastie be swimming laps when I hop in?
I can't remember where I got this recipe for this brew but it was really an experiment and my first time to make a smaller batch in a 5Litre Demijohn. I felt a bit guilty that I was making all this beer and SWMBO only really drinks very specific brands of cider. So this was my attempt to make a drink that she would like and I got her to make most of it too. :)
(Music Box) Mohammed Fellag, Sophie Nelisse, Emilien Neron, Danielle Proulx. A Montreal middle school class, devastated by the suicide of their teacher whose body was discovered by one of their number, is given a new teacher who has some baggage of his own. Cinema365 saw this as part of the recent Florida Film Festival, the review for which can be read here.
* “Submit yourselves, then, to God. Resist the devil, and he will flee from you.” (James 4:7 NIV)
Not sure there is a typical day – that’s why I love my job.
Out of the 2,300 Redcoat dragoons, only 170 managed to escape and some 1500 were taken prisoner by the Jacobites. Cope fled south to Berwick upon Tweed. Colonel James Gardiner, who stayed at Bankton House close by the scene of battle, was mortally wounded in a final heroic skirmish.
Bright and cheerful, cosy and welcoming, Cath Kidston again..... slurp! Sheer eye candy!
Lucky you.
I fear this may be true. We have become too pampered as a nation and we have passed this horrific trait on to our children. When you are a child, you do not realize that your academic career is incredibly short. You also do not realize that it is an opportunity. An opportunity not to be passed up.
Friday, Obama announced that most of the U.S. troops (150 troops will remain in Iraq) will come home by the end of this year. It will mark the end of a 10 year war that has cost America so much money, $757 billion, and so many lives in the name of ending terrorism. It is evident that we have not won the war…this is a war, in my opinion, is one that cannot be won. Terrorism will live in this world for as long as nations can’t religiously get along together and hold the same morals.
Chris Petrella (REP) 0.57% 30
Basically you have complete control and when you grasp Lightning’s business model, it makes self publishing very attractive. Book for book, an Author can make far more money self publishing (10 - 30%, or more, of retail price) than going through a traditional publisher (4-7%). It then simply comes down to quality, awareness, marketing and volume. To get to grips with this model I recommend reading ‘Aaron Shepard - POD for Profit’. He focuses on working with Lightning and provides all the information you need. On a side note, I believe many of the big publishers are also using Lightning for offset printing to fulfill orders, which says a lot about how far POD has come.
Growing up together, Casey and Pascal were the best of friends. He was a thoughtful, shy boy. He was totally in love with Casey. Nevertheless, his puppy love for her went unnoticed. He was a cute boy, soft-spoken and kind. Although he spent a lot of time hinting, to let her know how he felt about her, his efforts fell on deaf ears and blind eyes. Pascal was always courteous and subservient whenever Casey was concerned. He thought of her as a Southern Belle to the extreme. Still, Casey thought of Pascal as a brother. He was the closest thing she had to a sibling and the thought of him having a crush on her never entered her mind. His soft spot for her wasn’t even a sparkle in Casey’s eye.
5/5 service – always a smile and a thanks
"The idea is to not reward its whimpering," Doug said. "He has to learn to be in the kennel quietly."
I’ve read somewhere, on some blog or maybe I saw it in a movie, that this feeling is something that’s best shed as soon as possible. That the feeling is poisonous and might make you soft. Maybe.
and the first paragraph:
Ex Go-Go’s
We were well fed and clean and had a nice bed to sleep in. Who cares about listening to the mice that had nested in the walls?
And the question she is left asking herself comes when considering the personal animosity she witnessed - 'Why did they hate me so?' Surely only as a symbol of something wider.
To do it right child..."
Sek is a singer song writer who fronts the internationally successful band ‘Loso’, a ‘Thailish’ word meaning ‘Low-Society’, a statement that refers to their open animosity to the Thai elite class, locally known as ‘Hiso’ (Hi-society). I won’t go into the amount of money the band are worth now, let alone Sek personally, or his advertising deal with M150, a Thai energy drink.
"All right. All right."
My ambition, just over a year ago, was to get a short story published in a women's magazine.
In this world of blogging, and boy oh boy have I been peeking into a lot of uber cute corners since Gail and I's blog hop....I have reaffirmed my belief that people who blog..blog because they want to feel connected.
But not this year. Oh no. This year, I absolutely adore March. It's been sunny and 70 degrees for a startling number of days, and later this week, in honor of spring, it's going to be sunny and 78 degrees. I saw daffodils blooming at my mother's nursing home last week. What a winter.
My mother used to make these vadis in large quantity (enough for an year) for me, my sisters and herself, so today I am sharing my mother's pic with all of you, as she's setting out the vadis to dry in the sun.
I've lost my compass
But if, you just can't seem to get it smooth enough, and are still processing after about 15 minutes, add about a tablespoon of coconut oil, just to smooth it out.
“The Mole was bewitched, entranced, fascinated. By the side of the river he trotted as one trots, when very small, by the side of a man who holds one spell-bound by exciting stories; and when tired at last, he sat on the bank, while the river still chattered on to him, a babbling procession of the best stories in the world, sent from the heart of the earth to be told at last to the insatiable sea.” - Kenneth Grahame, The Wind in the Willows, Ch. 1
Boy oh boy, I thought I was going to have this all under control.
In the dark days of binge-drinking Britain, there’s no denying it’s much, much tougher to get approval from the “powers that be” on ideas for booze advertising.
* The haiku I write are lines of 3-5-3 syllables instead of 5-7-5.
Hey Everybody! Didn't mean to be away quite so long but it seems my Internet connection out of town has just about become non-existent unless I take my laptop out somewhere and this past week I just have not had much time. I know, same ol' story. Time at home is packed full of chores and such and just trying to rest a little.
Today, I finally have a minute to sit at the computer and think with you about color. Have you decided whether you are a Cool or Warm season? Whether you are a Winter, Summer, Fall or Spring?
Optional: salsa and sour cream
The most challenging part of this project is getting the super thick glue out of the bottle. My Tacky Tip? Setting the bottle upside down in a glass between squeezes. This simple trick takes away a lot of frustration. Especially for kids accustom to the constant and unstoppable flow provided by Elmer.
I should take this opportunity to two on three points. First, the TMFM is absolutely free. Second, bucking a trend popular in many museums these days, the TMFM not only allows photography, it encourages it. And third, the docents that staff the TMFM are really enthusiastic about what they do and are very well-informed about the collections and military history in general. They will tailor your tour to your tastes and level of interest, whether you are a novice or an expert.
Announcement of winners will be on JULY 4
It's surely her best ever record; Pearl's A Singer. I believe Leiber and Stoller produced this.
6. “Listen and be obedient!”
Easily my biggest disappointment of the year. I LOVE the Green Lantern story. Hal Jordan, test pilot, is bequeathed a magic ring that helps him guard the universe. His powers are only limited by his creativity and imagination (and the color yellow, idiotically enough). So many places to go with it. So many options. But no… It was just a bad, cheesy movie with laughable special effects and no imagination. Bad acting. Bad writing. Stupid villain. (Paralax, what?!!). Ryan Reynolds personal gift is snark, and they took that all away. Blake Lively is… terrible. What can I say? She’s the worst. It was tough to sit through. It was like they took an awesome superhero idea and spent a shitload of money on it, and instead of giving it to capable people like Christopher Nolan or Sam Mendes or Peter Jackson, they give it to a monkey with some crayons. It was just awful. Totally upsetting. Totally unoriginal.
So this is the purpose of Lent. To deprive myself of external things that only seem to give me what I want and need, in order to be less distracted from the true source of love.
“Actually I wanted to go to Hawaii all along,” he said. “During the season, I had my sights set on going there.”
It’s so simple and fresh that it could still run 100 years later.
There was a place where fans could write in a message and once in awhile, David would respond...not really to anyone personally. It was more of a general message to everyone. "Hi! I'm doing well! I want to thank all of you for taking the time to write me messages. I wish I could write to all of you personally."
You will need good quality colored pencils, I like prismacolor premiers.
If you want to have a go at one of these pop up cards, the tutorial is available in my left hand side bar.
And a cover for your print book. Trawl through all the advice-blogs; you don't need me to tell you how important the cover is. If you don't have a wonderful son-in-law to help, it is worth paying for this, too.
He also stated that it purged them very much.
She was tired and hungry, her emotions a lot more tender and erratic than normal. Falling to her knees when she could no longer run, Addison laid down in the wet grass, the prickly blades stinging her warm cheeks. Her heart pounded in her chest, Addison feeling every beat as it pulsed through her body.
Preheat over to 400°F. Pat your fish dry and sprinkle salt lightly on both sides. In a new bowl melt your butter and add Panko, cheese and pepper. Mix lightly with a fork. With your hands take mixture and press the mixture lightly onto the fish. Bake for 10-15 minutes until topping is golden and fish is firm, but not till the fish is dry. Smaller pieces will be ready sooner so adjust time accordingly.
Other times may be available but will need to be arranged.
Since watching a number of episodes of The Electric Company (yeah, Netflix!) she completely understands the concept of the silent E and while she doesn't know yet which words have a silent E and which don't, if she is struggling to say a word and I tell her "silent E," she can immediately say it; she knows exactly what each vowel should sound like in that situation. I think it's really cool how easily she learned that and how well she knows the vowels' different sounds. The Electric company has also taught Sweet Pea how to read words with 's or 've or 'd, etc. at the end. She doesn't yet fully understand possessive uses of apostrophes, but she totally gets that "doesn't" is a contraction of the words "does not." It is incredible how easily she picks up some of this language stuff!
He was not going to tell us anything we don’t already know;
So the younger 2 kids are gone and our oldest is out playing basketball. We rolled out of bed around 10 and from the moment I got up I was mad, hurt and upset about the argument the night before...
I was lucky enough to see the parent preview last night and it was terrific. This is a very funny show that really needs an audience of laughing patrons to make it even better. Standout performances were turned in by the entire cast. I was especially impressed by Sree Karri and Amy Walsh as the bumbling private detectives and A.J. Magoon as the lawyer.
And in Somebody Hold Me, Clinton Gandy displays an appealingly sleepy, bluesy voice, a talent that exists beyond questions of affirmation. With some training and practice, it could amount to something. Something more than Lovers, certainly.
· 1 lb. ground pork
3) “a people or group of peoples regarded as deriving from a common stock“
(d) to continue in force laws and appropriations which would lapse or otherwise become inoperative, and to modify or suspend the operation or application of those of an administrative character:
Teach them that religion can bring out the best in us--or the worst. Encourage them to explore what is sacred to them--what they most deeply value and care about, what goes beyond comfort and convenience and profit, what they want to protect and cherish, what they would take a stand for, work for, live for.
This is a sneak peak of the Friendship Mini Sampler Quilt Along that starts tomorrow.
And I hope you'll join me as I start the new year out with
I also should stop eating all I can …coz I’m getting kinda fat =S and everyday I have a battle with my closet trying to see what still fits me, hahahaha! I will end up wearing a blanket as dress, hahahaha!
The theme was revisited again in Star Trek: Nemesis. Mind you, that's what happen when you let Tom Hardy near a Star Trek movie. We don't expect it from the cuddly Next Generation crew. Thankfully it's all forgotten by the next episode. By the by, you might want to clear your Internet History after this. Not because of its adult nature - but you don't want anyone to find out you've been reading up on Star Trek, do you?
9. Black Friday
7. Hattiesburg Hustle
The problem with people like me is that when someone manages to push me into actual ANGER, the reaction is like 100x what it would be in a normal person. A normal person gets angry and talks smack about you behind your back until they eventually get over it. Me? I get angry and I will RUIN YOUR F**KING LIFE.
Yet, it’s hard to imagine how the population would or could revert back to public transit/private vehicle method of movement when the snow blows in. Simply put, Stockholm is not designed for easy car use. Or more to the point, the city flow is not dictated by cars. Now before you go flying off, all half-cocked, talking about its age and how it was built before car travel, there’s plenty of examples where old, pre-Henry Ford cities have been reconfigured to accommodate private vehicles first and foremost. Rome. London. New York. Toronto.
the seraphim, that joyous court of ardent love,
I gathered up my scrap DP (SU, M&MBI, and some Target "no name") and arranged and adhered them just as they were; no extra cutting. Then I cut out, edged, and stamped the sentiment (Studio g). I stamped it twice, once in brown, and once in white to give it some pop. I added a swirl from another Studio g set to give it some "somethin'-somethin'.
"How Come You Don't Call" - Alycia Keys. The real father of my children? He never calls.
Bard was taken out after recording one out in the sixth with a final line of 5.1 IP, 8 H, 4 R, 2 BB, 1 K before being pulled for Matt Albers. Albers recorded the final two outs of the sixth, and then his night was done as well. Newly recalled Clayton Mortensen entered the game for the seventh and threw a scoreless inning before the Sox got on the board in the bottom of the seventh. The Sox put runners on second and third to start the inning on a walk to Jarrod Saltalamacchia and a double for Will Middlebrooks. Marlon Byrd knocked a sacrifice fly to bring in Salty and make it a three-run game at 4-1. Mike Aviles got out before Ryan Sweeney and Dustin Pedroia walked to load the bases, bringing Adrian Gonzalez to the plate-- who struck out to end the inning. Dustin Pedroia knocked in another run with an RBI double in the ninth to make it 4-2, again leaving Adrian Gonzalez with the clutch hitting-- this time, Gonzalez grounded out. A lack of clutch hitting and one bad inning spoiled Will Middlebrooks' debut.
Stir the ham, onion and mushroom mixture into the sauce and serve over cooked spaghetti.
Nigar khan came to limelight in India after her music video of ‘Charhti Jawani’.
Tip-toeing on eggshells is
Thinking back on my experience perhaps I was naïve to venture into the area on my own, although I do live in east London, know the estates well and have rarely felt threatened. My Bengali neighbours, meanwhile, are particularly kind and well-liked because they tend to keep a tighter leash on their kids.
What d'you reckon?
But it seems to be relatively lonely in its confidence of success. Sonisphere and the Big Chill are just some of the bigger festivals that have pulled out due to organisation and ticket sale disasters this year, whilst a host of smaller festivals too have been forced to cancel. Oxegen’s promoters too have stated that, like Glastonbury, they will be taking a year off, despite it being Ireland’s biggest and most popular festival and winning numerous awards. Sources claim that lack of ticket sales are to blame.
Waterhouse has shown us a woman with frizzy rather than glossy black hair. Her face is in shadow so we have to get right up close to see her features and read her expression. She has a low, heavy forehead and a monobrow. Dark, smouldering eyes, full of intelligence and ambition with a hint of regret. A strong nose, sensuous lips and a firm, rounded chin.
Today is Bitterblue's release day! Happy reading to my readers. Happy birthday to my girl. It's been a long time coming. For them that's interested, here's just one of the many seeds that planted in my mind and helped Bitterblue grow:
Yesterday I could not post because I went to the snow. I went with my papa, 3 cousins, my cousins friend, aunt and uncle, and some people I don’t know. The sledding was really funn. You went SOOOO fast. Like oh my gosh fast. haha.
is it because we don't have the simple joy and appreciation
“Is that a problem?” she said softly.
Here's a finished project! This little counted cross-stitch took me forever to actually complete. The fabric is ivory, and the pale pink and pale ivory half-stitches were impossible for me to see what I was doing unless I was practically in sunlight, so I stalled at several points. Ah, well, it's done now! And looks lovely on my wall.
Me: "..."
US Cascade 6.0 % 0.50 oz 2.6 Loose Pellet Hops 5 Min From End
Michael Joseph Cunningham, 39, Princeton Junction, N.J.
You know, Kodi may not be much. She in fact is called a "tripod" now, meaning she has only 3 legs. She's lying at my feet snoring at the moment, settling back into her home in the first hours since leaving the hospital. But oh, she's not done teaching me about how to live - even how to live missionally in a ravaged, hard world full of injustice and the blight of evil. What a good dog she is.
In the quest for a nice bowl of Pho we visited Pho Hoa. In its own league many people has recommended this place and that was why we were there. Located at Quan 3, district 3 in HCM this shop can be spotted among a row of old colony buildings, but taxi drivers were so aware of this place that they can send you there in no time!
I have lost what little respect I had for Hugh Hefner. His message, once important, has become extinct in his continuing to perpetrate this cliché. I would respect him far more if he were to present the many bright, beautiful and accomplished older women today on his arm rather than young “girls” a fraction of his age. In truth, much of what makes a woman attractive is the confidence and sensuality she exudes from her mere presence. These qualities are achieved only over time and through experience – that, and a little touch of grey, I find incredibly sexy.
Cannon sleeps in til I threaten death and then he is up and running to the bus, sooo NO singing for cannon.
“Our personnel will provide security to prevent the protest from turning violent,” Mimika police chief Deny Edward Siregar told AFP.
By Helga van Staaden
Now we are cozy inside watching the snow. A chicken is in the oven, a bowl of "jacket potatoes" (British for baked potatoes) waiting on the table, a hearty salad, and baked fish for the non-chicken eaters and after dinner we will have hot cocoa with whipped cream and sprinkles.
When training horses, the experts recommend that, no matter what your discipline, you make sure to cross-train so that you’re not always working the same muscle groups or drilling the same exercises over and over. That means that, for hunter and jumper riders, you don’t jump every day. (Some don’t even jump every week.) Instead, you flat. A lot. You work on control, on suppling, and on your own form. (Two words: No. Stirrups. Who hasn’t been there and done that?) Similarly, if you’re a dressage rider, you don’t school the very collected movements all the time; you intersperse long and low work with collection and maybe you even incorporate some jumping or cavaletti work, hacks, or groundwork into your training sessions.
Example #3 - there were several noticeably pregnant women running (don't ask - it defies ALL laws of gravity in my mind to run THAT pregnant), and Mr. Fix-It told me, "We can't let the fetuses beat us - they're making their moms do ALL the work, and that's not right," in effort to keep us moving at the end.
We ended up having lunch in Mamre (R40 for a massive plate with salads and braaivleis/barbeque with the meat covering more than half the plate ;), seeing a beautiful exhibit with indigenous wild flowers and a stunning old Moravian church!
3 manufacturing
Sullen striking somber shit.
Fluffles is shaded with a pale gray pencil, but it's hard to see it in the photo. His eyes are dotted with a black gel pen. When I was ready to add my embellishments, I remembered the Doodlebug Sugar Coated CS I had in my stash...it matches the DP perfectly! I used an MFT die to cut the stars.
But as I grew up, I somehow figured out along the way that this was how oats were supposed to feel and taste. Now, I prefer my oatmeal made from real whole grains, and it’s been a while since I revisited the done-in-two-minutes-oats of my youth. While old-fashioned oatmeal takes a lot longer to cook, it might be just about the most satisfying thing to warm up with on a crisp spring morning.
It all began when she wrote a cultural guide to Rome, celebrating the role of women in the city's history.
All made from her garden, she must have spent the entire afternoon to prepare for that meal.
now lay your fabric pieces right sides together--this means that your batting will be on the outside as you sew. pin in place and sew, leaving approx 3 inches open for turning. trim the corners and turn right side out. press, so that the open edges used for turning are folded in 1/4", then sew around entire piece. use a 1/8" seam allowance here.
So how did Conan Doyle himself move from his early suspicion of Blavatsky and her circle, and his creation of the ultra-logical Sherlock Holmes, to become champion of spiritualism, author of The History of Spiritualism (1926) and (notoriously) dupe of the Cottingley Fairies hoax? Like Rudyard Kipling, he was a fervent supporter of British imperial expansion who had lost a son in the First World War: did a creed which denied the finality of death appeal? Houdini’s remorseless exposure of fake mediums and their tricks left Doyle grasping for explanations which would not destroy his own faith – he came up with the idea that Houdini was in fact himself a powerful medium who used his skill both to perform his own feats and also to ‘block’ the mediumistic abilities of others, so that they appeared to be frauds. The two – sadly – ceased to be friends.
A blog is a website or part of a website that is usually maintained by one person.
I have been familiar with Magnolia Stamps for quite sometime. Their signature line of cherubic like child images are super cute. These stamps come mounted on EZMount which makes them super easy to store (no bulky wood mounts) and also perfect for acrylic mounts. The Magnolia images work extremely well with Copic markers which are all the rage at the moment.
Here is Cinnamon, one of the new dogs at the Sanctuary. Isn’t she spectacular!
this was my first NYC birthday and as much as I wanted to have a giant celebration, being it was a wednesday and in nyc language that means "hottest day of the week" in clubland. in reality, pure exhaustion and laziness won so a night out took place the day after, which wasn't my actual birthday and is a big peeve of mine but whatever it was fun.
Can't I say "thank you" and demonstrate my gratitude just one more time?
Since I lacked the appropriate education and motivation necessary to secure a productive job I have made my living… if you can ennoble it by calling it that… as a musician and entertainer. I wrote articles for magazines etc. so I could afford icing on the cake. The involvement with wood I pretty much kept to myself. I used it to keep my boats afloat and to make their interiors absurdly fancy.
Your dream?
We were clueless. Anna and Emily are rock stars when it comes to planning great surprises.
Taking all of this into account, the entire situation is pretty pathetic if you ask me. I’m not interested in anyone else’s man and neither are any of the other women who fall victim to this sort of nonsense. And we’re especially not keen on any guy that has to be kept on a short leash because he is prone to sniffing around at ladies other than his own.
The Gujerati gentleman replied: Oh that’s nothing really. It’s a quiet place you know.
For me, the journey has already lasted longer than I thought it would.
If I had one criticism it would have to be the ending. The story offers up so much in terms of characters, plot and intrigue, that I wanted more in the big finale. Without giving away any spoilers, there's a great twist with one of the characters Ludwig meets along the way but I'm just not sure I quite believed the actions of another pivotal character. But I do wonder if it's because this is the first of a trilogy so perhaps things aren't quite what they seem. But I certainly wouldn't let this detract from what is a great steampunk fairytale and I look forward to reading the sequel, Rewired.
I am disturbed by the new backscatter devices and even more disturbed by the grope frisking that is your only alternative. I think both "options" are un-Constitutional and a highly suspect addition to our airport "security" processes.
Pretty cute, huh? Also, I got Jordan that Chemex coffee maker for Christmas -- have you used a Chemex? They're pretty cool. My brother is a coffee snob, and uses one daily, so that's where I got the idea, and we love it. When made with the Chemex, coffee is less bitter, more pure, and plus, it's just fun to make. I also appreciate the simple design of the canister.
"I had invited many rabbis and mainstream Jewish leaders to attend this demonstration. Many refused; saying that they didn't believe in criticizing Israel in public. I responded by saying, "If your beloved is about to walk off a cliff, wouldn't you reach out to restrain him?"
My first indispensable tool is a light box. I use it to trace the individual pieces in my applique on to the rough side of freezer paper.
And there will be a COCKTAIL at the SHOWROOM to see the new collections on 1st October! And I just received the email about this - so I can go! By invitiation only! That's so HOBO.
He received his PhD and MS from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign and his B.Tech. from the Indian Institute of Technology at Kharagpur.
Resist the New World Order:
This 90,000-sq.-ft. lakefront house, originally conceived for David Siegel, chief executive of time-share company Westgate Resorts, is currently unfinished. Construction was halted on the mansion during the recession, reported wsj.com. The house is designed to have 13 bedrooms, 23 baths, a main kitchen with 10 satellite kitchens, and three swimming pools. Siegel is selling the house for $100 million completed, or unfinished for $75 million.
Notes: For this recipe I used unpasteurized whole milk buttermilk that I purchased at a nearby farm. I have also made this with commercial buttermilk and I will say that there is a difference. They were both really, really good but the local buttermilk was definitely better and I don't think it had as much salt as the commercial (I am guessing because there was no ingredient list). My husband and I did a taste test before I made the ice cream and I was amazed how different tasting the buttermilks were.
20. Hell-Bound 5.04 (87/43)
Sorry guys for the lack of updates my blogger friends. I've been in Kansas City for about a week now and time has just been flying by! Today we hit our 14 week milestone and the babies have definitely sprouted over the past few days. I will update you with this crappy picture, but you get the point! Sorry for the dirty pajama pants.. I never have clean clothes with 2 bulldogs in the house!
is the first quilt Helen has ever made. She did not know it would be given
In my eyes, a documentary is ideally a blend of investigative and accurate journalism mixed in with multimedia, be it using a camera to capture real life footage or, as in this case, using animation to record these events.
If I ran a coffee shop or tea room in Southwell, I’d make more of that Bramley Apple connection, but at least there was Apple Crumble Cake to have with our tea and Blackberry & Apple Cake to go with the coffee.
5. The decay of religion, whose leaders lost their touch with life, and their power to guide the people.
is a perverted and dying land ripe for Judgment, for none but the True Church
“You lost me,” he says. “You lost me. You lost me and I’m closin’ the door.” He leans forward in his chair, ready to slam an imaginary door.
You can add a denim jacket for more of a dressed down Fall look or slip on tights when that Winter wind starts to blow for a totally different look. ‘ve worn these dresses with Sunglass also from Gold In The Night This is one versatile dress that will have you looking amazing!
Once or twice upon a time, I have mentioned ‘the sheltie.’ When I found my now husband’s profile on a dating website, one of his criteria was – “Love me, love my dogs.” He has been the proud dad of a number of dogs, almost all of them shelties. When we met he had two, Tucker and Dusty. Tucker was an aloof tricolour, mainly black. I’ll save his story for another time, as I don’t have access to one of his pictures at the moment.
Maybe my girl card should be revoked. Clearly, I’m not girly enough to understand this strange phenomenon, because even my three-year old niece has purses that are crammed full of stuff. Granted, I don’t recall ever carrying a Barbie everywhere with me, but that is neither here nor there.
This mission spoke to me for a variety of reasons. First off, after visiting the children in Guatemala, I have a new level of caring towards children born into poverty in foreign countries where little to no aid is available. Secondly, we are going to be helping these children with LITERACY. Anyone who reads my blog obviously knows that I care a lot about literacy and I do believe that having the ability to read will open up a whole new world to these children. There are over 47,000 children involved in child labor in Panama and if I can make a difference to just a few of them, I will have accomplished something amazing.
He published a slender collection of poems called Arguments with Gravity in 1996, followed two years later by Hard Light. 1998 also saw the publication of a collection of short stories, Flesh and Blood, and Crummey’s nomination for the Journey Prize.
We must continue to prove ourselves. There are many people out there that we have upset last November, and right where we need to show that us will not happen again. We have already begun our promises. The people have now been decent content for their money.
HAZYVIEW: Farm attack, but community shoots back and attackers flee.
March 13: Lambert’s song slips to number three.
and though i have a feeling it will feel very dated and/or convoluted in terms of narrative, good dance never goes out of style, and, not having seen it since i was maybe 8 or 9, i'm really in the mood for this mid-80s mikhail baryshnikov - gregory hines vehicle. this baby clocks in at over two hours, so my main concern: more dance, less KGB-impregnated plot.
- Share your needs with your suppliers
Mark Pavey: Mastering
Kittens crave them. Puppies love them.
Find a very hard surface, like concrete. Lay your hand towel down.
Queenstown, after all, is the birthplace of bungee jumping and is also home to a variety of adrenaline-charged activities that make you wonder who in their right mind would pay money to put their life in peril in the first place? That would be me!
Sometimes I feel like my life has a definite split between pre-2002-ish and post. I went to high school, had plenty of friends, and enjoyed my life greatly. I had often wished that I could just pause my senior year and relive it, over and over. I’m sure many of us have had the same thought. After school, I joined the military because I wanted to. I had this grand idea that it would be just like ROTC, that I would find my calling, that I would become a Marine Corps officer badass, retire, and go back to teaching ROTC in high school. There were other, loftier goals as well. One I remember was wanting to help write history instead of always just studying it… interesting, considering that I am now studying to become an anthropologist- history of humans. I have always been a bit of a patriot, and the Star Spangled Banner could always bring a tear to my eye. Once I joined the Navy, particularly during the third phase of my training, I became severely disillusioned. I realized that my occupational choice was based on all the wrong things and that it was not really what I wanted to do. Unfortunately, by that time, it was too late to make any sort of change. I also found that no matter how hard I tried, I would never be likely to become a Marine or an officer. I was surrounded by guys who were “taught” to distrust girls, and I had quite a bit of trouble finding friends who weren’t just trying to get in my pants. It was a very rude awakening into the “real world.” It was also something of the death of my creative side.
Yes! I said. Immediately. You see? So Compliant.
Then God said, “Let us make human beings in our image, to be like us. Genesis 1:26a (NLT)
* Turbine: The turbine consists of a number of large fan blades and a spindle. The spindle rotates when water strikes the blades. Thus the power of flowing water is converted to the rotational power of the spindle.
Pour 1 cup of lukewarm water for every coconut you've grated and stir well into the niyog. The water will be quickly absorbed by the grated coconut; just let it sit for about 5 minutes, then repeat the potato ricer method above. This time, you'll notice that more (about 1 and 1/4 cups) and thinner liquid will be extracted - this second pressing is simply called gatâ (milk). Transfer the milk to a bowl or cup, separate from the cream.
When I think of Levon Helm, who died yesterday of cancer at the age of 71, I think of the song “The Weight” with him and The Band plus the Staple Singers at ”The Last Waltz” concert in the Winterland Ballroom in San Francisco 1976.
While, I have never had a reason to actually dislike a Kindle or any other e-reader (I had never even held one in my hands until this weekend), I have always had a rather strong opinion on the subject. However, this opinion has nothing to do with the Kindle itself. I just have reasons why I personally don't want one.
The second reason most managers feel a little lost when they think about trust is that most of us resist the idea that trust is something you can actively and consciously encourage. ….”
I was nominated for a few awards and since I am new to this whole realm I needed to get my bearings before I passed them on. Thank you for being patient if you nominated me. It really is an honor to know someone was reading your blog and took the time to share.
The Shima Imperium verges on the brink of environmental collapse; decimated by clockwork industrialization and the machine-worshipers of the Lotus Guild. The skies are red as blood, land choked with toxic pollution, wildlife ravaged by mass extinctions.
September 8th Post Script:
HORATIO: What have we here, Frank?
We had been planning to get off to refuel at the next exit, about 8 miles away, and were surprised that the truck kept driving too. He didn't even really slow down, and made it on the other 17 wheels to the truck stop/service shop -- fortunate for him.
The concept is fairly simple it breaks down to the following over-all concepts;
One thing is for certain, this year City have made us all sit up and take notice. Mancini has finally managed to mould his world class players into a world class team, and it will no doubt be the team to beat for the foreseeable future in England, if not Europe. Sorry Fergie, there is certainly no chance of you having a quite few years before your retirement.
The soft colours of traditional Harris Tweed are famously inspired by – indeed originally dyed by – the colours of the Scottish landscape. These days, though, tweed is woven in all colours and has become a staple of the fashion set. Looking at the zing of this purple and orange together, though – and throwing in that blue we saw earlier – I realised that even the brightest tweeds could still be inspired by nature. And by sheep dip. Scotland is indeed a marvelous place.
“What a waste,” Xu Guan shook his head, “Why would they carry duplicate items when only one is needed for a squad?”
after our trip to switzerland, where all the food is fresh; and the hubs needing to change his diet and lifestyle because of his heart, we are eating and living quite differently than before. while i haven't completely cut out all fast food (ballet and soccer nights make that really hard) i have been buying lots more organic foods (especially meats and produce) and looking at the nutritional facts much more closely.
Hugs, Jan Mac
Overall, were I reading any book, fiction or non-fiction, that began like this, I would question the narrator’s reliability. Right off the bat, we are seeing conflicts with what we know to be true through reproducible science. We have to ask if we believe that everything was created in a literal 6 days, when the evidence we see says that it took millions of years for humans to come on the scene. According to the Bible, were dinosaurs and humans running around at the same time?
I recommend it for: Those interested in Women’s issues and civil rights
Hudson is 11 weeks old today! These last 11 weeks have just flown by. It’s weird to think that just 11 weeks ago I pushed a baby out….but then again, 11 weeks seems like forever ago. He is no longer a newborn which is so strange. Can’t believe he is almost 3 months old!
2062.E-IX/23/1998. On the Independent Counsel Act and related matters. Chicago Sun-Times, p. 50.
Blood marred the stone wall of his modest dorm room. His knuckles stung each time his fist slammed into the rough rock. Pain cloaked the bitterness and rage that
myself, how can I wing it so I might be able to spend my obligatory 8
Our daily life is inescapbly mundane if we follow a regular routine –wake up, work, eat, rest. So as to enjoy this mundane routine, my friends and I do something different out of those necessary schedule. As mentioned in my previous blog, there’s a time at work that we pause for a few seconds to pose for a picture. That’s a wonderful few seconds break from stress and boredom.
In recent times, more information about the spent fuel situation at the Fukushima-DaiIchi site has become known. It is my understanding that of the 1,532 spent fuel assemblies in reactor No. 4, 304 assemblies are fresh and unirradiated. This then leaves 1,231 irradiated spent fuel rods in pool No. 4, which contain roughly 37 million curies (~1.4E+18 Becquerel) of long-lived radioactivity. The No. 4 pool is about 100 feet above ground, is structurally damaged and is exposed to the open elements. If an earthquake or other event were to cause this pool to drain this could result in a catastrophic radiological fire involving nearly 10 times the amount of Cs-137 released by the Chernobyl accident.
I've since e-mailed and used the "feedback" form, to no avail. Others have gotten this response:
We had something special, Dave and I . We really did.
FOLLOW TheSoulMom publicly via Google Friend Connect (1 entry)
With Likes and Faces
The people who keep insisting that mass media and mass marketing are dead are brilliant at seeing all the trees, but are blind to the forest. They know about every app, widget, and website, but they can't see that it's all melding with TV, print, and radio to create an even more pervasive mega-media that is infecting and affecting everything we say and do.
The council said city employees should contribute more to their pensions.
Post a comment from now until Monday on this thread and you will be entered to win a package of Punky Sprouts, Spunky Sprouts album with beautiful Imaginisce Cottage Christmas collection!!
WHERE: Grand County Administration Building, 308 Byers Ave., Hot Sulphur Springs, CO 80451
USGA set to Release Film on Nicklaus’ first U.S. Open win (from Golf.com)
How much longer do you have? Insert time here until September 15th...
Turquoise, Celery, Saffron and Rose reinkers
I’d worked with John-boy over twenty years ago in London as we tried our best, in a busy office filled with Aussies, Kiwis and Northerners in flat caps and broad accents to pull TSB bank out of their bad lending quagmire. We even bungy-jumped together on a boozy winter weekend in Normandy, France, that resulted in AJ Hackett himself shortening the cord so that we didn't smash our heads into the frozen river below.
How does race have nothing to do with crime? Why does the media pretend there isn’t a connection here?
“Go ahead and scream because guess what? You’re going to get nothing until your mouth is shut.
This is the fabulous design I used for my card from The Sketchy Challenges. I worked perfectly with all the diecuts and punches I needed to use so I'm playing along in that challenge. I just loved using this layout!
April 13 - Hunter Bryce, porn actress, 30
3. Unforgiveness comes as a defense mode to protect the bruised inner self, which often is hidden from view or even our own awareness. (THIS ONE IS FOR ME!!)
Minnow, don't be glum.
Banana Man: Well, my Mom was Chiquita and my Dad was Monte, Del Monte.
Oh yeah!!! It's Robb and my wedding anniversary today!!! Happy anniversary to my dear Sweetheart! I can't believe it's been 24 years already!
'Homestead Purple' verbena
I'll be back tomorrow with some more fabulous flowers.
I hope you reading this with as much love and graditude that is in my heart, as it is over flowing ! :) - Any ding dings in you heart? Love Letter Nation would LOVE to hear from you (FB- LLN today!) ! That's our food :)
The thought of that made me laugh. Then I remembered a song I used to hear on Christian radio, years ago. I just can’t remember who did it. If some knows, please tell me the title.
Scissors: something I wear for work, and often forget to remove for photos.
Precipitating his ascent is Madeleine (Uma Thurman), the highly politicised wife of a newspaper man, who writes several influential articles in his name, lending him a vicarious sense of power and significance. Madeleine is the fiercely independent power behind the scenes in a society that doesn't openly covert the political opinions of women. Georges also seduces the wife of another member of the upper-crust, bedding Clotilde (an especially ravishing Christina Ricci) - being supremely casual with her affections in spite of her unending support and faith in him. Later Georges takes yet another lover in Madame Walter (an underused Kristen Scott-Thomas), a joyless older woman whom he beds simply in order to spite her husband, his business rival (Colm Meaney).
Eric’s pseudo-girlfriend Molly won’t touch the drugs, but she likes hooking up with Eric from time to time even though the two are not technically a couple. This of course is an obvious in for Schmidt, who has a thing for Molly even though she is barely legal and would probably be a little disturbed to know he’s a 24-year-old police officer.
It’s sad but true!
A game used Yvan Cournoyer. Normally these cards of retro players are all event worn pieces. But not this one. That, combined with the player choice, and that the swatch is torn = had to have it.
(yeah, go back and watch 2:54 again. And again. Ladies and gents: SIOBHAN MOTHAFUCKIN MAGNUS!!!)
The IDB lists DOE cumulative stored and/or disposed low-level wastes at 23.5 million curies for all locations except uranium mill tailing sites (and environmental restoration program wastes). A typical commercial nuclear reactor contains +/- 4 million curies of greater than class C wastes (GTCC) and +/- 100,000 curies of low-level waste. Comparing these figures with the total acknowledged inventories of low-level wastes in the IDB indicates that the curic inventories of uncontained “low-level” wastes, including reprocessed and recategorized high-level wastes, must be in the billions of curies even though the Baseline Environmental Monitoring Report contains not one specific citation of the inventory of anthropogenic radioactivity at any of the 150 sites in the DOE Environmental Management Program.
So, as writers like to do, I started asking myself, what if? What if two teens didn't want the day/the night to end? Why not? What was going on with them, and could I find enough of a story there to write a book?
“Deep Cover”
Our Saturday group of volunteers were busy clearing the invasive plant cotoneaster from the cliffs, where it is smothering the native plants. This hardy group meet once a month on a Saturday to undertake a variety of tasks led by Claire our Warden. They were like mountain goats as they stripped the low growing shrub off the rocky outcrops and then burned it to ensure it didn’t spread its seeds.
The story, as possibly familiar from movies, is that the culture of the British Navy, perhaps taken to an authoritarian extreme, strikes the values of the South Sea islanders and crumbles. The men rebel, and cast off their officers, taking local wives and fleeing to a different island. Bligh, in a feat of extraordinary seamanship, gets his people to safety. The Pandora (named, coincidentally, for a mythical temptress) is sent on a mission of reprisal. This ends in tragedy.
I have included a link to last year’s post on Cascade First Harvest Number 8 and, while I enjoyed that one, I think this new installment takes the overall flavour, balance and fullness to a better conclusion. Maybe it’s because I’m drinking this one about as fresh as I can get it – it just feels better.
When Gordon would return home and tell the stories to his parents, he found that they had no idea about any of it — their own parents were a mystery to them. It was at that point Gordon realized that each person is a closed treasure trove of stories and interpretations.
Is looking in the very thing that cannot be permitted?
Distortion also arises from what the TRC left out of its account. The commission rightly probed counter-revolutionary strategies and activities, some of them criminal. It failed adequately to probe the revolutionary activities the counter-revolution was supposedly designed to overcome.
Fisher
"I mean do you really love me?"
Yet what can one poor voice avail
Broadcast: Page Eight
See you Monday.
- View God as harsh, punisher, angry and dangerous.
Olivia
I think I’ll rate this as a four point zero. I’ve lived most of my life in Manhattan so I knew the territory where this game was being played . I do not know the rules of that particular game – but it was definitely fun to watch.
Mind, anyway builds it’s own world,
In both movies, Arnold attacks several cops. In The Terminator he kills 17 of them; in Terminator 2 he does it to scare them off without actually killing any.
Cline recorded the song the next week in one take, a version completely different from the demo. It became a classic and, ultimately, Cline’s signature song—and the one for which she remains best known. In late 1961, the song was an immediate country pop crossover hit, and also constituted her biggest pop hit, making the Top 10. Loretta Lynn later reported that the night Cline premiered “Crazy” at the Grand Ole Opry, she received three standing ovations.
Do you see it now?! Yes!! Buried under all my sewing room "treasures" is a Koala Sewing cabinet! OOOOOOO YAHHHHHHH. I bought the QuiltMate Pro IV with the outback extension table. Delivered yesterday and I am SO EXCITED to get creative again. But at the moment, I am putting the room back together. I have stuff in the hallway, stuff in Amelia's bedroom and everything else in my bedroom. I'm having heart palpitations with all the stuff all over. Tonight, Chris is going to attach the mini pressing and notion tables and I will be organizing myself. In a couple of weeks, I'll be getting a few more shelves for the cabinet. I wasn't sure if I would need them and now that I see the table and figuring where things are going to go, they will come in handy.
I passed people walking to the nearest bus-stops and kids on their way to school. I was making good time and when I stopped at Anantpuram at 8:30am, I’d cycled 65k and realized that i'd be in Sagara rather early. From there on it was a milestone countdown to Sagara. That’s something I’d been doing from the previous day, focusing on the next town that was within 30k and counting down the kilometers as I approached and then crossed it, and then picking another nearby town. The larger numbers on the milestones seem too abstract to comprehend.
Why save when they live for today
